Florida, session 2026, HB1189.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
72
73 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
74 16.71, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
75 16.71 Florida Gaming Control Commission; creation;
Page 3 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
76 meetings; membership.—
77 (2) MEMBERSHIP.—
78 (a) The commission shall consist of five members appointed
79 by the Governor, and subject to confirmation by the Senate, for
80 terms of 4 years. Members of the commission must be appointed by
81 January 1, 2022. The Governor shall consider appointees who
82 reflect Florida's racial, ethnic, and gender diversity. Of the
83 initial five members appointed by the Governor, and immediately
84 upon appointment, the Governor shall appoint one of the members
85 as the initial chair and one of the members as the initial vice
86 chair. At the end of the initial chair's and vice chair's terms
87 pursuant to subparagraph 1., the commission shall elect one of
88 the members of the commission as chair and one of the members of
89 the commission as vice chair.
90 1. For the purpose of providing staggered terms, of the
91 initial appointments, two members shall be appointed to 4-year
92 terms, two members shall be appointed to 3-year terms, and one
93 member shall be appointed to a 2-year term.
94 2. Of the five members, at least one member must have at
95 least 10 years of experience in law enforcement and criminal
96 investigations, at least one member must be a certified public
97 accountant licensed in this state with at least 10 years of
98 experience in accounting and auditing, and at least one member
99 must be an attorney admitted and authorized to practice law in
100 this state for at least the preceding 10 years.
Page 4 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
101 Section 2. Subsection (2) of section 17.11, Florida
102 Statutes, is amended to read:
103 17.11 To report disbursements made.—
104 (2) The Chief Financial Officer shall also cause to have
105 reported from the Florida Accounting Information Resource
106 Subsystem no less than quarterly the disbursements which
107 agencies made to small businesses, as defined in s. 288.703 the
108 Florida Small and Minority Business Assistance Act; to certified
109 minority business enterprises in the aggregate; and to certified
110 minority business enterprises broken down into categories of
111 minority persons, as well as gender and nationality subgroups.
112 This information shall be made available to the agencies, the
113 Office of Supplier Development Diversity, the Governor, the
114 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
115 Representatives. Each agency shall be responsible for the
116 accuracy of information entered into the Florida Accounting
117 Information Resource Subsystem for use in this reporting.
118 Section 3. Paragraphs (e) and (k) of subsection (4) and
119 paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 20.60, Florida
120 Statutes, are amended to read:
121 20.60 Department of Commerce; creation; powers and
122 duties.—
123 (4) The purpose of the department is to assist the
124 Governor in working with the Legislature, state agencies,
125 business leaders, and economic development professionals to
Page 5 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
126 formulate and implement coherent and consistent policies and
127 strategies designed to promote economic opportunities for all
128 Floridians. The department is the state's chief agency for
129 business recruitment and expansion and economic development. To
130 accomplish such purposes, the department shall:
131 (e) Manage the activities of public-private partnerships
132 and state agencies in order to avoid duplication and promote
133 coordinated and consistent implementation of programs in areas
134 including, but not limited to, tourism; international trade and
135 investment; business recruitment, creation, retention, and
136 expansion; minority and small business development; defense,
137 space, and aerospace development; rural community development;
138 and the development and promotion of professional and amateur
139 sporting events.
140 (k) Assist, promote, and enhance economic opportunities
141 for this state's minority-owned businesses and rural and urban
142 communities.
143 (5) The divisions within the department have specific
144 responsibilities to achieve the duties, responsibilities, and
145 goals of the department. Specifically:
146 (a) The Division of Economic Development shall:
147 1. Analyze and evaluate business prospects identified by
148 the Governor and the secretary.
149 2. Administer certain tax refund, tax credit, and grant
150 programs created in law. Notwithstanding any other provision of
Page 6 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
151 law, the department may expend interest earned from the
152 investment of program funds deposited in the Grants and
153 Donations Trust Fund to contract for the administration of those
154 programs, or portions of the programs, assigned to the
155 department by law, by the appropriations process, or by the
156 Governor. Such expenditures shall be subject to review under
157 chapter 216.
158 3. Develop measurement protocols for the state incentive
159 programs and for the contracted entities which will be used to
160 determine their performance and competitive value to the state.
161 Performance measures, benchmarks, and sanctions must be
162 developed in consultation with the legislative appropriations
163 committees and the appropriate substantive committees, and are
164 subject to the review and approval process provided in s.
165 216.177. The approved performance measures, standards, and
166 sanctions shall be included and made a part of the strategic
167 plan for contracts entered into for delivery of programs
168 authorized by this section.
169 4. Develop a 5-year statewide strategic plan. The
170 strategic plan must include, but need not be limited to:
171 a. Strategies for the promotion of business formation,
172 expansion, recruitment, and retention through aggressive
173 marketing, attraction of venture capital and finance
174 development, domestic trade, international development, and
175 export assistance, which lead to more and better jobs and higher
Page 7 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
176 wages for all geographic regions, disadvantaged communities, and
177 populations of the state, including rural areas, minority
178 businesses, and urban core areas.
179 b. The development of realistic policies and programs to
180 further the economic diversity of the state, its regions, and
181 their associated industrial clusters.
182 c. Specific provisions for the stimulation of economic
183 development and job creation in rural areas and midsize cities
184 and counties of the state, including strategies for rural
185 marketing and the development of infrastructure in rural areas.
186 d. Provisions for the promotion of the successful long-
187 term economic development of the state with increased emphasis
188 in market research and information.
189 e. Plans for the generation of foreign investment in the
190 state which create jobs paying above-average wages and which
191 result in reverse investment in the state, including programs
192 that establish viable overseas markets, assist in meeting the
193 financing requirements of export-ready firms, broaden
194 opportunities for international joint venture relationships, use
195 the resources of academic and other institutions, coordinate
196 trade assistance and facilitation services, and facilitate
197 availability of and access to education and training programs
198 that assure requisite skills and competencies necessary to
199 compete successfully in the global marketplace.
200 f. The identification of business sectors that are of
Page 8 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
201 current or future importance to the state's economy and to the
202 state's global business image, and development of specific
203 strategies to promote the development of such sectors.
204 g. Strategies for talent development necessary in the
205 state to encourage economic development growth, taking into
206 account factors such as the state's talent supply chain,
207 education and training opportunities, and available workforce.
208 h. Strategies and plans to support this state's defense,
209 space, and aerospace industries and the emerging complementary
210 business activities and industries that support the development
211 and growth of defense, space, and aerospace in this state.
212 5. Update the strategic plan every 5 years.
213 6. Involve CareerSource Florida, Inc.; direct-support
214 organizations of the department; local governments; the general
215 public; local and regional economic development organizations;
216 other local, state, and federal economic, international, and
217 workforce development entities; the business community; and
218 educational institutions to assist with the strategic plan.
219 7. Coordinate with the Florida Tourism Industry Marketing
220 Corporation in the development of the 4-year marketing plan
221 pursuant to s. 288.1226(13).
222 8. Administer and manage relationships, as appropriate,
223 with the entities and programs created pursuant to the Florida
224 Capital Formation Act, ss. 288.9621-288.96255.
225 Section 4. Section 24.113, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
Page 9 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
226 Section 5. Subsection (1) of section 43.16, Florida
227 Statutes, is amended to read:
228 43.16 Justice Administrative Commission; membership,
229 powers and duties.—
230 (1) There is hereby created a Justice Administrative
231 Commission, with headquarters located in the state capital. The
232 necessary office space for use of the commission shall be
233 furnished by the proper state agency in charge of state
234 buildings. For purposes of the fees imposed on agencies pursuant
235 to s. 287.057(22) s. 287.057(24), the Justice Administrative
236 Commission shall be exempt from such fees.
237 Section 6. Subsection (1) of section 110.105, Florida
238 Statutes, is amended to read:
239 110.105 Employment policy of the state.—
240 (1) It is the purpose of this chapter to establish a
241 system of personnel management. This system shall provide means
242 to recruit, select, train, develop, and maintain an effective
243 and responsible workforce and shall include policies and
244 procedures for employee hiring and advancement, training and
245 career development, position classification, salary
246 administration, benefits, discipline, discharge, employee
247 performance evaluations, affirmative action, and other related
248 activities.
249 Section 7. Section 110.112, Florida Statutes, is amended
250 to read:
Page 10 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
251 110.112 Affirmative action; Equal employment opportunity.—
252 (1) It is the policy of this state to provide equal
253 opportunities in employment. Discrimination in employment
254 because of race, gender, creed, color, or national origin is
255 prohibited. Executive agencies may not use racial or gender set-
256 asides, preferences, or quotas when making decisions regarding
257 the hiring, retention, or promotion of a state employee assist
258 in providing the assurance of equal employment opportunity
259 through programs of affirmative and positive action that will
260 allow full utilization of women, minorities, and individuals who
261 have a disability.
262 (2)(a) The head of each executive agency shall develop and
263 implement an affirmative action plan in accordance with rules
264 adopted by the department and approved by a majority vote of the
265 Administration Commission before their adoption.
266 (b) Each executive agency shall establish annual goals for
267 ensuring full utilization of groups underrepresented in the
268 agency's workforce, including women, minorities, and individuals
269 who have a disability, as compared to the relevant labor market,
270 as defined by the agency. Each executive agency shall design its
271 affirmative action plan to meet its established goals.
272 (c) Each executive agency shall annually report to the
273 department regarding the agency's progress toward increasing
274 employment among women, minorities, and individuals who have a
275 disability.
Page 11 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
276 (d) An affirmative action-equal employment opportunity
277 officer shall be appointed by the head of each executive agency.
278 The affirmative action-equal employment opportunity officer's
279 responsibilities must include determining annual goals,
280 monitoring agency compliance, and providing consultation to
281 managers regarding progress, deficiencies, and appropriate
282 corrective action.
283 (e) The department shall report information in its annual
284 workforce report relating to the implementation, continuance,
285 updating, and results of each executive agency's affirmative
286 action plan for the previous fiscal year. The annual workforce
287 report must also include data for each executive agency relating
288 to employment levels among women, minorities, and individuals
289 who have a disability.
290 (f) The department shall provide to all supervisory
291 personnel of the executive agencies training in the principles
292 of equal employment opportunity and affirmative action, the
293 development and implementation of affirmative action plans, and
294 the establishment of annual affirmative action goals. The
295 department may contract for training services, and each
296 participating agency shall reimburse the department for costs
297 incurred through such contract. After the department approves
298 the contents of the training program for the agencies, the
299 department may delegate this training to the executive agencies.
300 (2)(3)(a) The department, in consultation with the Agency
Page 12 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
301 for Persons with Disabilities, the Division of Vocational
302 Rehabilitation and the Division of Blind Services of the
303 Department of Education, the Department of Commerce, and the
304 Executive Office of the Governor, shall develop and implement
305 programs that incorporate internships, mentoring, on-the-job
306 training, unpaid work experience, situational assessments, and
307 other innovative strategies that are specifically geared toward
308 individuals who have a disability.
309 (b) By January 1, 2017, the department shall develop
310 mandatory training programs for human resources personnel and
311 hiring managers of executive agencies which support the
312 employment of individuals who have a disability.
313 (c)1. By January 1, 2017, each executive agency shall
314 develop an agency-specific plan that addresses how to promote
315 employment opportunities for individuals who have a disability.
316 2. The department shall assist executive agencies in the
317 implementation of agency-specific plans. The department shall
318 regularly report to the Governor, the President of the Senate,
319 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives the progress of
320 executive agencies in implementing these plans. Such reports
321 shall be made at least biannually.
322 (d) The department shall compile data regarding the hiring
323 practices of executive agencies with regard to individuals who
324 have a disability and make such data available on its website.
325 (e) The department shall assist executive agencies in
Page 13 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
326 identifying and implementing strategies for retaining employees
327 who have a disability which include, but are not limited to,
328 training programs, funding reasonable accommodations, increasing
329 access to appropriate technologies, and ensuring accessibility
330 of physical and virtual workplaces.
331 (f) The department shall adopt rules relating to forms
332 that provide for the voluntary self-identification of
333 individuals who have a disability and are employed by an
334 executive agency.
335 (g) This subsection does not create any substantive or
336 procedural right or benefit enforceable at law or in equity
337 against the state or a state agency, or an officer, employee, or
338 agent thereof.
339 (4) Each state attorney and public defender shall:
340 (a) Develop and implement an affirmative action plan.
341 (b) Establish annual goals for ensuring full utilization
342 of groups underrepresented in its workforce as compared to the
343 relevant labor market in this state. The state attorneys' and
344 public defenders' affirmative action plans must be designed to
345 meet the established goals.
346 (c) Appoint an affirmative action-equal employment
347 opportunity officer.
348 (3)(5) The state and, its agencies and officers shall
349 ensure freedom from discrimination in employment as provided by
350 the Florida Civil Rights Act of 1992, by s. 112.044, and by this
Page 14 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
351 chapter.
352 (4)(6) Any individual claiming to be aggrieved by an
353 unlawful employment practice may file a complaint with the
354 Florida Commission on Human Relations or the Attorney General as
355 provided by s. 760.11.
356 (5)(7) The department shall review and monitor executive
357 agency actions in carrying out the rules adopted by the
358 department pursuant to this section.
359 Section 8. Subsections (1) and (4) of section 110.211,
360 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
361 110.211 Recruitment.—
362 (1) Recruiting shall be planned and carried out in a
363 manner that assures open competition based upon current and
364 projected employing agency needs, taking into consideration the
365 number and types of positions to be filled and the labor market
366 conditions, with special emphasis placed on recruiting efforts
367 to attract minorities, women, or other groups that are
368 underrepresented in the workforce of the employing agency.
369 (4) All recruitment literature involving state position
370 vacancies shall contain the phrase "An Equal Opportunity
371 Employer/Affirmative Action Employer."
372 Section 9. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
373 110.605, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
374 110.605 Powers and duties; personnel rules, records,
375 reports, and performance appraisal.—
Page 15 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
376 (1) The department shall adopt and administer uniform
377 personnel rules, records, and reports relating to employees and
378 positions in the Selected Exempt Service, as well as any other
379 rules and procedures relating to personnel administration which
380 are necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.
381 (d) The department shall develop a program of affirmative
382 and positive actions that will ensure full utilization of women
383 and minorities in Selected Exempt Service positions.
384 Section 10. Paragraph (b) of subsection (21) of section
385 187.201, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
386 187.201 State Comprehensive Plan adopted.—The Legislature
387 hereby adopts as the State Comprehensive Plan the following
388 specific goals and policies:
389 (21) THE ECONOMY.—
390 (b) Policies.—
391 1. Attract new job-producing industries, corporate
392 headquarters, distribution and service centers, regional
393 offices, and research and development facilities to provide
394 quality employment for the residents of Florida.
395 2. Promote entrepreneurship and small and minority-owned
396 business startups startup by providing technical and information
397 resources, facilitating capital formation, and removing
398 regulatory restraints which are unnecessary for the protection
399 of consumers and society.
400 3. Maintain, as one of the state's primary economic
Page 16 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
401 assets, the environment, including clean air and water, beaches,
402 forests, historic landmarks, and agricultural and natural
403 resources.
404 4. Strengthen Florida's position in the world economy
405 through attracting foreign investment and promoting
406 international banking and trade.
407 5. Build on the state's attractiveness to make it a leader
408 in the visual and performing arts and in all phases of film,
409 television, and recording production.
410 6. Promote economic development for Florida residents
411 through partnerships among education, business, industry,
412 agriculture, and the arts.
413 7. Provide increased opportunities for training Florida's
414 workforce to provide skilled employees for new and expanding
415 business.
416 8. Promote economic self-sufficiency through training and
417 educational programs which result in productive employment.
418 9. Promote cooperative employment arrangements between
419 private employers and public sector employment efforts to
420 provide productive, permanent employment opportunities for
421 public assistance recipients through provisions of education
422 opportunities, tax incentives, and employment training.
423 10. Provide for nondiscriminatory employment
424 opportunities.
425 11. Provide quality child day care for public assistance
Page 17 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
426 families and others who need it in order to work.
427 12. Encourage the development of a business climate that
428 provides opportunities for the growth and expansion of existing
429 state industries, particularly those industries which are
430 compatible with Florida's environment.
431 13. Promote coordination among Florida's ports to increase
432 their utilization.
433 14. Encourage the full utilization by businesses of the
434 economic development enhancement programs implemented by the
435 Legislature for the purpose of extensively involving private
436 businesses in the development and expansion of permanent job
437 opportunities, especially for the economically disadvantaged,
438 through the utilization of enterprise zones, community
439 development corporations, and other programs designed to enhance
440 economic and employment opportunities.
441 Section 11. Paragraph (g) of subsection (3) of section
442 212.096, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
443 212.096 Sales, rental, storage, use tax; enterprise zone
444 jobs credit against sales tax.—
445 (3) In order to claim this credit, an eligible business
446 must file under oath with the governing body or enterprise zone
447 development agency having jurisdiction over the enterprise zone
448 where the business is located, as applicable, a statement which
449 includes:
450 (g) Whether the business is a small business as defined in
Page 18 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
451 s. 288.703 by s. 288.703(6).
452 Section 12. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
453 215.971, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
454 215.971 Agreements funded with federal or state
455 assistance.—
456 (2) For each agreement funded with federal or state
457 financial assistance, the state agency shall designate an
458 employee to function as a grant manager who shall be responsible
459 for enforcing performance of the agreement's terms and
460 conditions and who shall serve as a liaison with the recipient
461 or subrecipient.
462 (a)1. Each grant manager who is responsible for agreements
463 in excess of the threshold amount for CATEGORY TWO under s.
464 287.017 must, at a minimum, complete training conducted by the
465 Chief Financial Officer for accountability in contracts and
466 grant management.
467 2. Effective December 1, 2014, each grant manager
468 responsible for agreements in excess of $100,000 annually must
469 complete the training and become a certified contract manager as
470 provided under s. 287.057(13) s. 287.057(15). All grant managers
471 must become certified contract managers within 24 months after
472 establishment of the training and certification requirements by
473 the Department of Management Services and the Department of
474 Financial Services.
475 Section 13. Sections 255.101 and 255.102, Florida
Page 19 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
476 Statutes, are repealed.
477 Section 14. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
478 255.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
479 255.20 Local bids and contracts for public construction
480 works; specification of state-produced lumber.—
481 (1) A county, municipality, special district as defined in
482 chapter 189, or other political subdivision of the state seeking
483 to construct or improve a public building, structure, or other
484 public construction works must competitively award to an
485 appropriately licensed contractor each project that is estimated
486 to cost more than $300,000. For electrical work, the local
487 government must competitively award to an appropriately licensed
488 contractor each project that is estimated to cost more than
489 $75,000. As used in this section, the term "competitively award"
490 means to award contracts based on the submission of sealed bids,
491 proposals submitted in response to a request for proposal,
492 proposals submitted in response to a request for qualifications,
493 or proposals submitted for competitive negotiation. This
494 subsection expressly allows contracts for construction
495 management services, design/build contracts, continuation
496 contracts based on unit prices, and any other contract
497 arrangement with a private sector contractor permitted by any
498 applicable municipal or county ordinance, by district
499 resolution, or by state law. For purposes of this section, cost
500 includes employee compensation and benefits, except inmate
Page 20 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
501 labor, the cost of equipment and maintenance, insurance costs,
502 and the cost of direct materials to be used in the construction
503 of the project, including materials purchased by the local
504 government, and other direct costs, plus a factor of 20 percent
505 for management, overhead, and other indirect costs. Subject to
506 the provisions of subsection (3), the county, municipality,
507 special district, or other political subdivision may establish,
508 by municipal or county ordinance or special district resolution,
509 procedures for conducting the bidding process.
510 (c) The provisions of this subsection do not apply:
511 1. If the project is undertaken to replace, reconstruct,
512 or repair an existing public building, structure, or other
513 public construction works damaged or destroyed by a sudden
514 unexpected turn of events such as an act of God, riot, fire,
515 flood, accident, or other urgent circumstances, and such damage
516 or destruction creates:
517 a. An immediate danger to the public health or safety;
518 b. Other loss to public or private property which requires
519 emergency government action; or
520 c. An interruption of an essential governmental service.
521 2. If, after notice by publication in accordance with the
522 applicable ordinance or resolution, the governmental entity does
523 not receive any responsive bids or proposals.
524 3. To construction, remodeling, repair, or improvement to
525 a public electric or gas utility system if such work on the
Page 21 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
526 public utility system is performed by personnel of the system.
527 4. To construction, remodeling, repair, or improvement by
528 a utility commission whose major contracts are to construct and
529 operate a public electric utility system.
530 5. If the project is undertaken as repair or maintenance
531 of an existing public facility. For the purposes of this
532 paragraph, the term "repair" means a corrective action to
533 restore an existing public facility to a safe and functional
534 condition and the term "maintenance" means a preventive or
535 corrective action to maintain an existing public facility in an
536 operational state or to preserve the facility from failure or
537 decline. Repair or maintenance includes activities that are
538 necessarily incidental to repairing or maintaining the facility.
539 Repair or maintenance does not include the construction of any
540 new building, structure, or other public construction works or
541 any substantial addition, extension, or upgrade to an existing
542 public facility. Such additions, extensions, or upgrades shall
543 be considered substantial if the estimated cost of the
544 additions, extensions, or upgrades included as part of the
545 repair or maintenance project exceeds the threshold amount in
546 subsection (1) and exceeds 20 percent of the estimated total
547 cost of the repair or maintenance project fully accounting for
548 all costs associated with performing and completing the work,
549 including employee compensation and benefits, equipment cost and
550 maintenance, insurance costs, and the cost of direct materials
Page 22 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
551 to be used in the construction of the project, including
552 materials purchased by the local government, and other direct
553 costs, plus a factor of 20 percent for management, overhead, and
554 other indirect costs. An addition, extension, or upgrade may
555 shall not be considered substantial if it is undertaken pursuant
556 to the conditions specified in subparagraph 1. Repair and
557 maintenance projects and any related additions, extensions, or
558 upgrades may not be divided into multiple projects for the
559 purpose of evading the requirements of this subparagraph.
560 6. If the project is undertaken exclusively as part of a
561 public educational program.
562 7. If the funding source of the project will be diminished
563 or lost because the time required to competitively award the
564 project after the funds become available exceeds the time within
565 which the funding source must be spent.
566 8. If the local government competitively awarded a project
567 to a private sector contractor and the contractor abandoned the
568 project before completion or the local government terminated the
569 contract.
570 9. If the governing board of the local government complies
571 with all of the requirements of this subparagraph, conducts a
572 public meeting under s. 286.011 after public notice, and finds
573 by majority vote of the governing board that it is in the
574 public's best interest to perform the project using its own
575 services, employees, and equipment. The public notice must be
Page 23 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
576 published at least 21 days before the date of the public meeting
577 at which the governing board takes final action. The notice must
578 identify the project, the components and scope of the work, and
579 the estimated cost of the project fully accounting for all costs
580 associated with performing and completing the work, including
581 employee compensation and benefits, equipment cost and
582 maintenance, insurance costs, and the cost of direct materials
583 to be used in the construction of the project, including
584 materials purchased by the local government, and other direct
585 costs, plus a factor of 20 percent for management, overhead, and
586 other indirect costs. The notice must specify that the purpose
587 for the public meeting is to consider whether it is in the
588 public's best interest to perform the project using the local
589 government's own services, employees, and equipment. Upon
590 publication of the public notice and for 21 days thereafter, the
591 local government shall make available for public inspection,
592 during normal business hours and at a location specified in the
593 public notice, a detailed itemization of each component of the
594 estimated cost of the project and documentation explaining the
595 methodology used to arrive at the estimated cost. At the public
596 meeting, any qualified contractor or vendor who could have been
597 awarded the project had the project been competitively bid shall
598 be provided with a reasonable opportunity to present evidence to
599 the governing board regarding the project and the accuracy of
600 the local government's estimated cost of the project. In
Page 24 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
601 deciding whether it is in the public's best interest for the
602 local government to perform a project using its own services,
603 employees, and equipment, the governing board must consider the
604 estimated cost of the project fully accounting for all costs
605 associated with performing and completing the work, including
606 employee compensation and benefits, equipment cost and
607 maintenance, insurance costs, and the cost of direct materials
608 to be used in the construction of the project, including
609 materials purchased by the local government, and other direct
610 costs, plus a factor of 20 percent for management, overhead, and
611 other indirect costs, and the accuracy of the estimated cost in
612 light of any other information that may be presented at the
613 public meeting and whether the project requires an increase in
614 the number of government employees or an increase in capital
615 expenditures for public facilities, equipment, or other capital
616 assets. The local government may further consider the impact on
617 local economic development, the impact on small and minority
618 business owners, the impact on state and local tax revenues,
619 whether the private sector contractors provide health insurance
620 and other benefits equivalent to those provided by the local
621 government, and any other factor relevant to what is in the
622 public's best interest. A report summarizing completed projects
623 constructed by the local government pursuant to this subsection
624 shall be publicly reviewed each year by the governing body of
625 the local government. The report shall detail the estimated
Page 25 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
626 costs and the actual costs of the projects constructed by the
627 local government pursuant to this subsection. The report shall
628 be made available for review by the public. The Auditor General
629 shall review the report as part of his or her audits of local
630 governments.
631 10. If the governing board of the local government
632 determines upon consideration of specific substantive criteria
633 that it is in the best interest of the local government to award
634 the project to an appropriately licensed private sector
635 contractor pursuant to administrative procedures established by
636 and expressly set forth in a charter, ordinance, or resolution
637 of the local government adopted before July 1, 1994. The
638 criteria and procedures must be set out in the charter,
639 ordinance, or resolution and must be applied uniformly by the
640 local government to avoid awarding a project in an arbitrary or
641 capricious manner. This exception applies only if all of the
642 following occur:
643 a. The governing board of the local government, after
644 public notice, conducts a public meeting under s. 286.011 and
645 finds by a two-thirds vote of the governing board that it is in
646 the public's best interest to award the project according to the
647 criteria and procedures established by charter, ordinance, or
648 resolution. The public notice must be published at least 14 days
649 before the date of the public meeting at which the governing
650 board takes final action. The notice must identify the project,
Page 26 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
651 the estimated cost of the project, and specify that the purpose
652 for the public meeting is to consider whether it is in the
653 public's best interest to award the project using the criteria
654 and procedures permitted by the preexisting charter, ordinance,
655 or resolution.
656 b. The project is to be awarded by any method other than a
657 competitive selection process, and the governing board finds
658 evidence that:
659 (I) There is one appropriately licensed contractor who is
660 uniquely qualified to undertake the project because that
661 contractor is currently under contract to perform work that is
662 affiliated with the project; or
663 (II) The time to competitively award the project will
664 jeopardize the funding for the project, materially increase the
665 cost of the project, or create an undue hardship on the public
666 health, safety, or welfare.
667 c. The project is to be awarded by any method other than a
668 competitive selection process, and the published notice clearly
669 specifies the ordinance or resolution by which the private
670 sector contractor will be selected and the criteria to be
671 considered.
672 d. The project is to be awarded by a method other than a
673 competitive selection process, and the architect or engineer of
674 record has provided a written recommendation that the project be
675 awarded to the private sector contractor without competitive
Page 27 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
676 selection, and the consideration by, and the justification of,
677 the government body are documented, in writing, in the project
678 file and are presented to the governing board prior to the
679 approval required in this paragraph.
680 11. To projects subject to chapter 336.
681 Section 15. Subsection (5) of section 282.201, Florida
682 Statutes, is amended to read:
683 282.201 State data center.—The state data center is
684 established within the department. The provision of data center
685 services must comply with applicable state and federal laws,
686 regulations, and policies, including all applicable security,
687 privacy, and auditing requirements. The department shall appoint
688 a director of the state data center who has experience in
689 leading data center facilities and has expertise in cloud-
690 computing management.
691 (5) NORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER CONTRACT.—In order for
692 the department to carry out its duties and responsibilities
693 relating to the state data center, the secretary of the
694 department shall contract by July 1, 2022, with the Northwest
695 Regional Data Center pursuant to s. 287.057(10) s. 287.057(11).
696 The contract shall provide that the Northwest Regional Data
697 Center will manage the operations of the state data center and
698 provide data center services to state agencies.
699 (a) The department shall provide contract oversight,
700 including, but not limited to, reviewing invoices provided by
Page 28 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
701 the Northwest Regional Data Center for services provided to
702 state agency customers.
703 (b) The department shall approve or request updates to
704 invoices within 10 business days after receipt. If the
705 department does not respond to the Northwest Regional Data
706 Center, the invoice will be approved by default. The Northwest
707 Regional Data Center must submit approved invoices directly to
708 state agency customers.
709 Section 16. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
710 282.709, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
711 282.709 State agency law enforcement radio system and
712 interoperability network.—
713 (3) In recognition of the critical nature of the statewide
714 law enforcement radio communications system, the Legislature
715 finds that there is an immediate danger to the public health,
716 safety, and welfare, and that it is in the best interest of the
717 state to continue partnering with the system's current operator.
718 The Legislature finds that continuity of coverage is critical to
719 supporting law enforcement, first responders, and other public
720 safety users. The potential for a loss in coverage or a lack of
721 interoperability between users requires emergency action and is
722 a serious concern for officers' safety and their ability to
723 communicate and respond to various disasters and events.
724 (a) The department, pursuant to s. 287.057(10) s.
725 287.057(11), shall enter into a 15-year contract with the entity
Page 29 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
726 that was operating the statewide radio communications system on
727 January 1, 2021. The contract must include:
728 1. The purchase of radios;
729 2. The upgrade to the Project 25 communications standard;
730 3. Increased system capacity and enhanced coverage for
731 system users;
732 4. Operations, maintenance, and support at a fixed annual
733 rate;
734 5. The conveyance of communications towers to the
735 department; and
736 6. The assignment of communications tower leases to the
737 department.
738 Section 17. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
739 286.101, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
740 286.101 Foreign gifts and contracts.—
741 (3)
742 (b) Disclosure under this subsection is not required with
743 respect to:
744 1. A proposal to sell commodities through the online
745 procurement program established pursuant to s. 287.057(20) s.
746 287.057(22);
747 2. A proposal to sell commodities to a university pursuant
748 to Board of Governors Regulation 18.001;
749 3. An application or proposal from an entity that
750 discloses foreign gifts or grants under subsection (2) or s.
Page 30 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
751 1010.25;
752 4. An application or proposal from a foreign source that,
753 if granted or accepted, would be disclosed under subsection (2)
754 or s. 1010.25; or
755 5. An application or proposal from a public or not-for-
756 profit research institution with respect to research funded by
757 any federal agency.
758 Section 18. Subsections (19) through (29) of section
759 287.012, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (18)
760 through (28), respectively, and subsection (18) and present
761 subsection (19) of that section are amended, to read:
762 287.012 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
763 (18) "Minority business enterprise" has the same meaning
764 as provided in s. 288.703.
765 (18)(19) "Office" means the Office of Supplier Development
766 Diversity of the Department of Management Services.
767 Section 19. Paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (2) and
768 paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (3) of section 287.042,
769 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
770 287.042 Powers, duties, and functions.—The department
771 shall have the following powers, duties, and functions:
772 (2)(a) To establish purchasing agreements and procure
773 state term contracts for commodities and contractual services,
774 pursuant to s. 287.057, under which state agencies shall, and
775 eligible users may, make purchases pursuant to s. 287.056. The
Page 31 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
776 department may restrict purchases from some term contracts to
777 state agencies only for those term contracts where the inclusion
778 of other governmental entities will have an adverse effect on
779 competition or to those federal facilities located in this
780 state. In such planning or purchasing the Office of Supplier
781 Diversity may monitor to ensure that opportunities are afforded
782 for contracting with minority business enterprises. The
783 department, for state term contracts, and all agencies, for
784 multiyear contractual services or term contracts, shall explore
785 reasonable and economical means to utilize certified minority
786 business enterprises. Purchases by any county, municipality,
787 private nonprofit community transportation coordinator
788 designated pursuant to chapter 427, while conducting business
789 related solely to the Commission for the Transportation
790 Disadvantaged, or other local public agency under the provisions
791 in the state purchasing contracts, and purchases, from the
792 corporation operating the correctional work programs, of
793 products or services that are subject to paragraph (1)(f), are
794 exempt from the competitive solicitation requirements otherwise
795 applying to their purchases.
796 (c) Any person who files an action protesting a decision
797 or intended decision pertaining to contracts administered by the
798 department, a water management district, or an agency pursuant
799 to s. 120.57(3)(b) shall post with the department, the water
800 management district, or the agency at the time of filing the
Page 32 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
801 formal written protest a bond payable to the department, the
802 water management district, or agency in an amount equal to 1
803 percent of the estimated contract amount. For protests of
804 decisions or intended decisions pertaining to exceptional
805 purchases, the bond shall be in an amount equal to 1 percent of
806 the estimated contract amount for the exceptional purchase. The
807 estimated contract amount shall be based upon the contract price
808 submitted by the protestor or, if no contract price was
809 submitted, the department, water management district, or agency
810 shall estimate the contract amount based on factors including,
811 but not limited to, the price of previous or existing contracts
812 for similar commodities or contractual services, the amount
813 appropriated by the Legislature for the contract, or the fair
814 market value of similar commodities or contractual services. The
815 agency shall provide the estimated contract amount to the vendor
816 within 72 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and state
817 holidays, after the filing of the notice of protest by the
818 vendor. The estimated contract amount is not subject to protest
819 pursuant to s. 120.57(3). The bond shall be conditioned upon the
820 payment of all costs and charges that are adjudged against the
821 protestor in the administrative hearing in which the action is
822 brought and in any subsequent appellate court proceeding. In
823 lieu of a bond, the department, the water management district,
824 or agency may, in either case, accept a cashier's check,
825 official bank check, or money order in the amount of the bond.
Page 33 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
826 If, after completion of the administrative hearing process and
827 any appellate court proceedings, the department, water
828 management district, or agency prevails, it shall recover all
829 costs and charges which shall be included in the final order or
830 judgment, excluding attorney's fees. This section shall not
831 apply to protests filed by the Office of Supplier Diversity.
832 Upon payment of such costs and charges by the protestor, the
833 bond, cashier's check, official bank check, or money order shall
834 be returned to the protestor. If, after the completion of the
835 administrative hearing process and any appellate court
836 proceedings, the protestor prevails, the protestor shall recover
837 from the department, water management district, or agency all
838 costs and charges which shall be included in the final order or
839 judgment, excluding attorney's fees.
840 (3) To establish a system of coordinated, uniform
841 procurement policies, procedures, and practices to be used by
842 agencies in acquiring commodities and contractual services,
843 which shall include, but not be limited to:
844 (b)1. Development of procedures for advertising
845 solicitations. These procedures must provide for electronic
846 posting of solicitations for at least 10 days before the date
847 set for receipt of bids, proposals, or replies, unless the
848 department or other agency determines in writing that a shorter
849 period of time is necessary to avoid harming the interests of
850 the state. The Office of Supplier Diversity may consult with the
Page 34 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
851 department regarding the development of solicitation
852 distribution procedures to ensure that maximum distribution is
853 afforded to certified minority business enterprises as defined
854 in s. 288.703.
855 2. Development of procedures for electronic posting. The
856 department shall designate a centralized website on the Internet
857 for the department and other agencies to electronically post
858 solicitations, decisions or intended decisions, and other
859 matters relating to procurement.
860 (c) Development of procedures for the receipt and opening
861 of bids, proposals, or replies by an agency. Such procedures
862 shall provide the Office of Supplier Diversity an opportunity to
863 monitor and ensure that the contract award is consistent with
864 the requirements of s. 287.09451.
865 Section 20. Paragraph (d) of subsection (3) and paragraph
866 (b) of subsection (4) of section 287.055, Florida Statutes, are
867 amended to read:
868 287.055 Acquisition of professional architectural,
869 engineering, landscape architectural, or surveying and mapping
870 services; definitions; procedures; contingent fees prohibited;
871 penalties.—
872 (3) PUBLIC ANNOUNCEMENT AND QUALIFICATION PROCEDURES.—
873 (d) Each agency shall evaluate professional services,
874 including capabilities, adequacy of personnel, past record,
875 experience, whether the firm is a certified minority business
Page 35 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
876 enterprise as defined by the Florida Small and Minority Business
877 Assistance Act, and other factors determined by the agency to be
878 applicable to its particular requirements. When securing
879 professional services, an agency must endeavor to meet the
880 minority business enterprise procurement goals under s.
881 287.09451.
882 (4) COMPETITIVE SELECTION.—
883 (b) The agency shall select in order of preference no
884 fewer than three firms deemed to be the most highly qualified to
885 perform the required services. In determining whether a firm is
886 qualified, the agency shall consider such factors as the ability
887 of professional personnel; whether a firm is a certified
888 minority business enterprise; past performance; willingness to
889 meet time and budget requirements; location; recent, current,
890 and projected workloads of the firms; and the volume of work
891 previously awarded to each firm by the agency, with the object
892 of effecting an equitable distribution of contracts among
893 qualified firms, provided such distribution does not violate the
894 principle of selection of the most highly qualified firms. The
895 agency may request, accept, and consider proposals for the
896 compensation to be paid under the contract only during
897 competitive negotiations under subsection (5).
898 Section 21. Subsections (9), (10), (11), and (13) through
899 (28) of section 287.057, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as
900 subsections (8), (9), (10), and (11) through (26), respectively,
Page 36 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
901 and subsections (7) and (8), present subsections (12) and (14),
902 paragraph (d) of present subsection (15), and present subsection
903 (18) of that section are amended, to read:
904 287.057 Procurement of commodities or contractual
905 services.—
906 (7) Upon issuance of any solicitation, an agency shall,
907 upon request by the department, forward to the department one
908 copy of each solicitation for all commodity and contractual
909 services purchases in excess of the threshold amount provided in
910 s. 287.017 for CATEGORY TWO. An agency shall also, upon request,
911 furnish a copy of all competitive-solicitation tabulations. The
912 Office of Supplier Diversity may also request from the agencies
913 any information submitted to the department pursuant to this
914 subsection.
915 (8)(a) In order to strive to meet the minority business
916 enterprise procurement goals set forth in s. 287.09451, an
917 agency may reserve any contract for competitive solicitation
918 only among certified minority business enterprises. Agencies
919 shall review all their contracts each fiscal year and shall
920 determine which contracts may be reserved for solicitation only
921 among certified minority business enterprises. This reservation
922 may only be used when it is determined, by reasonable and
923 objective means, before the solicitation that there are capable,
924 qualified certified minority business enterprises available to
925 submit a bid, proposal, or reply on a contract to provide for
Page 37 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
926 effective competition. The Office of Supplier Diversity shall
927 consult with any agency in reaching such determination when
928 deemed appropriate.
929 (b) Before a contract may be reserved for solicitation
930 only among certified minority business enterprises, the agency
931 head must find that such a reservation is in the best interests
932 of the state. All determinations shall be subject to s.
933 287.09451(5). Once a decision has been made to reserve a
934 contract, but before sealed bids, proposals, or replies are
935 requested, the agency shall estimate what it expects the amount
936 of the contract to be, based on the nature of the services or
937 commodities involved and their value under prevailing market
938 conditions. If all the sealed bids, proposals, or replies
939 received are over this estimate, the agency may reject the bids,
940 proposals, or replies and request new ones from certified
941 minority business enterprises, or the agency may reject the
942 bids, proposals, or replies and reopen the bidding to all
943 eligible vendors.
944 (c) All agencies shall consider the use of price
945 preferences of up to 10 percent, weighted preference formulas,
946 or other preferences for vendors as determined appropriate
947 pursuant to guidelines established in accordance with s.
948 287.09451(4) to increase the participation of minority business
949 enterprises.
950 (d) All agencies shall avoid any undue concentration of
Page 38 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
951 contracts or purchases in categories of commodities or
952 contractual services in order to meet the minority business
953 enterprise purchasing goals in s. 287.09451.
954 (12) If two equal responses to a solicitation or a request
955 for quote are received and one response is from a certified
956 minority business enterprise, the agency shall enter into a
957 contract with the certified minority business enterprise.
958 (13)(14) Contracts for commodities or contractual services
959 may be renewed for a period that may not exceed 3 years or the
960 term of the original contract, whichever is longer. Renewal of a
961 contract for commodities or contractual services must be in
962 writing and is subject to the same terms and conditions set
963 forth in the initial contract and any written amendments signed
964 by the parties. If the commodity or contractual service is
965 purchased as a result of the solicitation of bids, proposals, or
966 replies, the price of the commodity or contractual service to be
967 renewed must be specified in the bid, proposal, or reply, except
968 that an agency may negotiate lower pricing. A renewal contract
969 may not include any compensation for costs associated with the
970 renewal. Renewals are contingent upon satisfactory performance
971 evaluations by the agency and subject to the availability of
972 funds. Exceptional purchase contracts pursuant to paragraphs
973 (3)(a) and (c) may not be renewed. With the exception of
974 subsection (10) (11), if a contract amendment results in a
975 longer contract term or increased payments, a state agency may
Page 39 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
976 not renew or amend a contract for the outsourcing of a service
977 or activity that has an original term value exceeding $5 million
978 before submitting a written report concerning contract
979 performance to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and
980 the Speaker of the House of Representatives at least 90 days
981 before execution of the renewal or amendment.
982 (12)(15)
983 (d) Each contract manager who is responsible for contracts
984 in excess of $10 million annually must, in addition to the
985 training required in paragraph (b) and the training and
986 certification required in paragraph (c), possess at least 3 5
987 years of experience managing contracts of at least in excess of
988 $5 million in total annually.
989 (15)(18) Any person who supervises contract administrators
990 or contract or grant managers that meet criteria for
991 certification in subsection (13) (15) shall annually complete
992 public procurement training for supervisors within 12 months
993 after appointment to the supervisory position. The department is
994 responsible for establishing and disseminating the training
995 course content required for supervisors.
996 Section 22. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
997 287.0571, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
998 287.0571 Business case to outsource; applicability.—
999 (3) This section does not apply to:
1000 (a) A procurement of commodities and contractual services
Page 40 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1001 listed in s. 287.057(3)(d) and (e) and (21) (23).
1002 Section 23. Paragraph (c) of subsection (10) of section
1003 287.059, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1004 287.059 Private attorney services.—
1005 (10) Agencies are encouraged to use the following criteria
1006 when selecting outside firms for attorney services:
1007 (c) The firm's minority status.
1008 Section 24. Sections 287.093, 287.0931, 287.094, 287.0943,
1009 and 287.09431, Florida Statutes, are repealed.
1010 Section 25. Section 287.09451, Florida Statutes, is
1011 amended to read:
1012 287.09451 Office of Supplier Development Diversity;
1013 powers, duties, and functions.—
1014 (1) The Legislature finds that there is evidence of a
1015 systematic pattern of past and continuing racial discrimination
1016 against minority business enterprises and a disparity in the
1017 availability and use of minority business enterprises in the
1018 state procurement system. It is determined to be a compelling
1019 state interest to rectify such discrimination and disparity.
1020 Based upon statistical data profiling this discrimination, the
1021 Legislature has enacted race-conscious and gender-conscious
1022 remedial programs to ensure minority participation in the
1023 economic life of the state, in state contracts for the purchase
1024 of commodities and services, and in construction contracts. The
1025 purpose and intent of this section is to increase participation
Page 41 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1026 by minority business enterprises accomplished by encouraging the
1027 use of minority business enterprises and the entry of new and
1028 diversified minority business enterprises into the marketplace.
1029 (1)(2) The Office of Supplier Development Diversity is
1030 established within the Department of Management Services to
1031 assist Florida-based small minority business enterprises in
1032 becoming suppliers of commodities, services, and construction to
1033 state government.
1034 (2)(3) The secretary shall appoint an executive director
1035 for the Office of Supplier Development Diversity, who shall
1036 serve at the pleasure of the secretary.
1037 (3)(4) The Office of Supplier Development Diversity shall
1038 have the following powers, duties, and functions:
1039 (a) To receive and disseminate information:
1040 1. For the continued growth and success of Florida's small
1041 businesses, which may include the planning, hosting, and support
1042 of events for Florida-based enterprises.
1043 2. Related to procurement opportunities for Florida-based
1044 small business enterprises.
1045 (b) To create electronic certification and recertification
1046 processes for veteran-owned small business enterprises. The
1047 certifications must be valid for 2 years and must be recertified
1048 every 2 years thereafter. The benefits of certification must be
1049 clearly posted on the department's website. To be eligible for
1050 certification and recertification as a veteran-owned business
Page 42 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1051 enterprise, a business must meet the requirements of s. 295.187.
1052 (c) To advise and provide education or other resources to
1053 agencies on methods and techniques for achieving procurement
1054 objectives that increase the use of Florida-based enterprises in
1055 state and local government procurement contracts.
1056 (d) To adopt rules, establish processes, and prescribe and
1057 publish forms as necessary to carry out the duties provided in
1058 this section.
1059 (a) To adopt rules to determine what constitutes a "good
1060 faith effort" for purposes of state agency compliance with the
1061 minority business enterprise procurement goals set forth in s.
1062 287.042. Factors which shall be considered by the Minority
1063 Business Enterprise Assistance Office in determining good faith
1064 effort shall include, but not be limited to:
1065 1. Whether the agency scheduled presolicitation or prebid
1066 meetings for the purpose of informing minority business
1067 enterprises of contracting and subcontracting opportunities.
1068 2. Whether the contractor advertised in general
1069 circulation, trade association, or minority-focus media
1070 concerning the subcontracting opportunities.
1071 3. Whether the agency effectively used services and
1072 resources of available minority community organizations;
1073 minority contractors' groups; local, state, and federal minority
1074 business assistance offices; and other organizations that
1075 provide assistance in the recruitment and placement of minority
Page 43 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1076 business enterprises or minority persons.
1077 4. Whether the agency provided written notice to a
1078 reasonable number of minority business enterprises that their
1079 interest in contracting with the agency was being solicited in
1080 sufficient time to allow the minority business enterprises to
1081 participate effectively.
1082 (b) To adopt rules to determine what constitutes a "good
1083 faith effort" for purposes of contractor compliance with
1084 contractual requirements relating to the use of services or
1085 commodities of a minority business enterprise under s.
1086 287.094(2). Factors which shall be considered by the Office of
1087 Supplier Diversity in determining whether a contractor has made
1088 good faith efforts shall include, but not be limited to:
1089 1. Whether the contractor attended any presolicitation or
1090 prebid meetings that were scheduled by the agency to inform
1091 minority business enterprises of contracting and subcontracting
1092 opportunities.
1093 2. Whether the contractor advertised in general
1094 circulation, trade association, or minority-focus media
1095 concerning the subcontracting opportunities.
1096 3. Whether the contractor provided written notice to a
1097 reasonable number of specific minority business enterprises that
1098 their interest in the contract was being solicited in sufficient
1099 time to allow the minority business enterprises to participate
1100 effectively.
Page 44 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1101 4. Whether the contractor followed up initial
1102 solicitations of interest by contacting minority business
1103 enterprises or minority persons to determine with certainty
1104 whether the minority business enterprises or minority persons
1105 were interested.
1106 5. Whether the contractor selected portions of the work to
1107 be performed by minority business enterprises in order to
1108 increase the likelihood of meeting the minority business
1109 enterprise procurement goals, including, where appropriate,
1110 breaking down contracts into economically feasible units to
1111 facilitate minority business enterprise participation.
1112 6. Whether the contractor provided interested minority
1113 business enterprises or minority persons with adequate
1114 information about the plans, specifications, and requirements of
1115 the contract or the availability of jobs.
1116 7. Whether the contractor negotiated in good faith with
1117 interested minority business enterprises or minority persons,
1118 not rejecting minority business enterprises or minority persons
1119 as unqualified without sound reasons based on a thorough
1120 investigation of their capabilities.
1121 8. Whether the contractor effectively used the services of
1122 available minority community organizations; minority
1123 contractors' groups; local, state, and federal minority business
1124 assistance offices; and other organizations that provide
1125 assistance in the recruitment and placement of minority business
Page 45 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1126 enterprises or minority persons.
1127 (c) To adopt rules and do all things necessary or
1128 convenient to guide all state agencies toward making
1129 expenditures for commodities, contractual services,
1130 construction, and architectural and engineering services with
1131 certified minority business enterprises in accordance with the
1132 minority business enterprise procurement goals set forth in s.
1133 287.042.
1134 (d) To monitor the degree to which agencies procure
1135 services, commodities, and construction from minority business
1136 enterprises in conjunction with the Department of Financial
1137 Services as specified in s. 17.11.
1138 (e) To receive and disseminate information relative to
1139 procurement opportunities, availability of minority business
1140 enterprises, and technical assistance.
1141 (f) To advise agencies on methods and techniques for
1142 achieving procurement objectives.
1143 (g) To provide a central minority business enterprise
1144 certification process which includes independent verification of
1145 status as a minority business enterprise.
1146 (h) To develop procedures to investigate complaints
1147 against minority business enterprises or contractors alleged to
1148 violate any provision related to this section or s. 287.0943,
1149 that may include visits to worksites or business premises, and
1150 to refer all information on businesses suspected of
Page 46 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1151 misrepresenting minority status to the Department of Management
1152 Services for investigation. When an investigation is completed
1153 and there is reason to believe that a violation has occurred,
1154 the matter shall be referred to the office of the Attorney
1155 General, Department of Legal Affairs, for prosecution.
1156 (i) To maintain a directory of all minority business
1157 enterprises which have been certified and provide this
1158 information to any agency or business requesting it.
1159 (j) To encourage all firms which do more than $1 million
1160 in business with the state within a 12-month period to develop,
1161 implement, and submit to this office a minority business
1162 development plan.
1163 (k) To communicate on a monthly basis with the Small and
1164 Minority Business Advisory Council to keep the council informed
1165 on issues relating to minority enterprise procurement.
1166 (l) To serve as an advocate for minority business
1167 enterprises, and coordinate with the small and minority business
1168 ombudsman, as defined in s. 288.703, which duties shall include:
1169 1. Ensuring that agencies supported by state funding
1170 effectively target the delivery of services and resources, as
1171 related to minority business enterprises.
1172 2. Establishing standards within each industry with which
1173 the state government contracts on how agencies and contractors
1174 may provide the maximum practicable opportunity for minority
1175 business enterprises.
Page 47 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1176 3. Assisting agencies and contractors by providing
1177 outreach to minority businesses, by specifying and monitoring
1178 technical and managerial competence for minority business
1179 enterprises, and by consulting in planning of agency procurement
1180 to determine how best to provide opportunities for minority
1181 business enterprises.
1182 4. Integrating technical and managerial assistance for
1183 minority business enterprises with government contracting
1184 opportunities.
1185 (m) To certify minority business enterprises, as defined
1186 in s. 288.703, and as specified in ss. 287.0943 and 287.09431,
1187 and shall recertify such minority businesses at least once every
1188 2 years. Minority business enterprises must be recertified at
1189 least once every 2 years. Such certifications may include an
1190 electronic signature.
1191 (n)1. To develop procedures to be used by an agency in
1192 identifying commodities, contractual services, architectural and
1193 engineering services, and construction contracts, except those
1194 architectural, engineering, construction, or other related
1195 services or contracts subject to the provisions of chapter 339,
1196 that could be provided by minority business enterprises. Each
1197 agency is encouraged to spend 21 percent of the moneys actually
1198 expended for construction contracts, 25 percent of the moneys
1199 actually expended for architectural and engineering contracts,
1200 24 percent of the moneys actually expended for commodities, and
Page 48 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1201 50.5 percent of the moneys actually expended for contractual
1202 services during the previous fiscal year, except for the state
1203 university construction program which shall be based upon public
1204 education capital outlay projections for the subsequent fiscal
1205 year, and reported to the Legislature pursuant to s. 216.023,
1206 for the purpose of entering into contracts with certified
1207 minority business enterprises as defined in s. 288.703, or
1208 approved joint ventures. However, in the event of budget
1209 reductions pursuant to s. 216.221, the base amounts may be
1210 adjusted to reflect such reductions. The overall spending goal
1211 for each industry category shall be subdivided as follows:
1212 a. For construction contracts: 4 percent for black
1213 Americans, 6 percent for Hispanic-Americans, and 11 percent for
1214 American women.
1215 b. For architectural and engineering contracts: 9 percent
1216 for Hispanic-Americans, 1 percent for Asian-Americans, and 15
1217 percent for American women.
1218 c. For commodities: 2 percent for black Americans, 4
1219 percent for Hispanic-Americans, 0.5 percent for Asian-Americans,
1220 0.5 percent for Native Americans, and 17 percent for American
1221 women.
1222 d. For contractual services: 6 percent for black
1223 Americans, 7 percent for Hispanic-Americans, 1 percent for
1224 Asian-Americans, 0.5 percent for Native Americans, and 36
1225 percent for American women.
Page 49 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1226 2. For the purposes of commodities contracts for the
1227 purchase of equipment to be used in the construction and
1228 maintenance of state transportation facilities involving the
1229 Department of Transportation, the terms "minority business
1230 enterprise" and "minority person" have the same meanings as
1231 provided in s. 288.703. In order to ensure that the goals
1232 established under this paragraph for contracting with certified
1233 minority business enterprises are met, the department, with the
1234 assistance of the Office of Supplier Diversity, shall make
1235 recommendations to the Legislature on revisions to the goals,
1236 based on an updated statistical analysis, at least once every 5
1237 years. Such recommendations shall be based on statistical data
1238 indicating the availability of and disparity in the use of
1239 minority businesses contracting with the state.
1240 3. In determining the base amounts for assessing
1241 compliance with this paragraph, the Office of Supplier Diversity
1242 may develop, by rule, guidelines for all agencies to use in
1243 establishing such base amounts. These rules must include, but
1244 are not limited to, guidelines for calculation of base amounts,
1245 a deadline for the agencies to submit base amounts, a deadline
1246 for approval of the base amounts by the Office of Supplier
1247 Diversity, and procedures for adjusting the base amounts as a
1248 result of budget reductions made pursuant to s. 216.221.
1249 4. To determine guidelines for the use of price
1250 preferences, weighted preference formulas, or other preferences,
Page 50 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1251 as appropriate to the particular industry or trade, to increase
1252 the participation of minority businesses in state contracting.
1253 These guidelines shall include consideration of:
1254 a. Size and complexity of the project.
1255 b. The concentration of transactions with minority
1256 business enterprises for the commodity or contractual services
1257 in question in prior agency contracting.
1258 c. The specificity and definition of work allocated to
1259 participating minority business enterprises.
1260 d. The capacity of participating minority business
1261 enterprises to complete the tasks identified in the project.
1262 e. The available pool of minority business enterprises as
1263 prime contractors, either alone or as partners in an approved
1264 joint venture that serves as the prime contractor.
1265 5. To determine guidelines for use of joint ventures to
1266 meet minority business enterprises spending goals. For purposes
1267 of this section, "joint venture" means any association of two or
1268 more business concerns to carry out a single business enterprise
1269 for profit, for which purpose they combine their property,
1270 capital, efforts, skills, and knowledge. The guidelines shall
1271 allow transactions with joint ventures to be eligible for credit
1272 against the minority business enterprise goals of an agency when
1273 the contracting joint venture demonstrates that at least one
1274 partner to the joint venture is a certified minority business
1275 enterprise as defined in s. 288.703, and that such partner is
Page 51 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1276 responsible for a clearly defined portion of the work to be
1277 performed, and shares in the ownership, control, management,
1278 responsibilities, risks, and profits of the joint venture. Such
1279 demonstration shall be by verifiable documents and sworn
1280 statements and may be reviewed by the Office of Supplier
1281 Diversity at or before the time a contract bid, proposal, or
1282 reply is submitted. An agency may count toward its minority
1283 business enterprise goals a portion of the total dollar amount
1284 of a contract equal to the percentage of the ownership and
1285 control held by the qualifying certified minority business
1286 partners in the contracting joint venture, so long as the joint
1287 venture meets the guidelines adopted by the office.
1288 (o)1. To establish a system to record and measure the use
1289 of certified minority business enterprises in state contracting.
1290 This system shall maintain information and statistics on
1291 certified minority business enterprise participation, awards,
1292 dollar volume of expenditures and agency goals, and other
1293 appropriate types of information to analyze progress in the
1294 access of certified minority business enterprises to state
1295 contracts and to monitor agency compliance with this section.
1296 Such reporting must include, but is not limited to, the
1297 identification of all subcontracts in state contracting by
1298 dollar amount and by number of subcontracts and the
1299 identification of the utilization of certified minority business
1300 enterprises as prime contractors and subcontractors by dollar
Page 52 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1301 amounts of contracts and subcontracts, number of contracts and
1302 subcontracts, minority status, industry, and any conditions or
1303 circumstances that significantly affected the performance of
1304 subcontractors. Agencies shall report their compliance with the
1305 requirements of this reporting system at least annually and at
1306 the request of the office. All agencies shall cooperate with the
1307 office in establishing this reporting system. Except in
1308 construction contracting, all agencies shall review contracts
1309 costing in excess of CATEGORY FOUR as defined in s. 287.017 to
1310 determine if such contracts could be divided into smaller
1311 contracts to be separately solicited and awarded, and shall,
1312 when economical, offer such smaller contracts to encourage
1313 minority participation.
1314 2. To report agency compliance with the provisions of
1315 subparagraph 1. for the preceding fiscal year to the Governor
1316 and Cabinet, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
1317 House of Representatives on or before February 1 of each year.
1318 The report must contain, at a minimum, the following:
1319 a. Total expenditures of each agency by industry.
1320 b. The dollar amount and percentage of contracts awarded
1321 to certified minority business enterprises by each state agency.
1322 c. The dollar amount and percentage of contracts awarded
1323 indirectly to certified minority business enterprises as
1324 subcontractors by each state agency.
1325 d. The total dollar amount and percentage of contracts
Page 53 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1326 awarded to certified minority business enterprises, whether
1327 directly or indirectly, as subcontractors.
1328 e. A statement and assessment of good faith efforts taken
1329 by each state agency.
1330 f. A status report of agency compliance with subsection
1331 (6), as determined by the Minority Business Enterprise Office.
1332 (5)(a) Each agency shall, at the time the specifications
1333 or designs are developed or contract sizing is determined for
1334 any proposed procurement costing in excess of CATEGORY FOUR, as
1335 defined in s. 287.017, forward a notice to the Office of
1336 Supplier Diversity of the proposed procurement and any
1337 determination on the designs of specifications of the proposed
1338 procurement that impose requirements on prospective vendors, no
1339 later than 30 days prior to the issuance of a solicitation,
1340 except that this provision shall not apply to emergency
1341 acquisitions. The 30-day notice period shall not toll the time
1342 for any other procedural requirements.
1343 (b) If the Office of Supplier Diversity determines that
1344 the proposed procurement will not likely allow opportunities for
1345 minority business enterprises, the office may, within 20 days
1346 after it receives the information specified in paragraph (a),
1347 propose the implementation of minority business enterprise
1348 utilization provisions or submit alternative procurement methods
1349 that would significantly increase minority business enterprise
1350 contracting opportunities.
Page 54 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1351 (c) Whenever the agency and the Office of Supplier
1352 Diversity disagree, the matter shall be submitted for
1353 determination to the head of the agency or the senior-level
1354 official designated pursuant to this section as liaison for
1355 minority business enterprise issues.
1356 (d) If the proposed procurement proceeds to competitive
1357 solicitation, the office is hereby granted standing to protest,
1358 pursuant to this section, in a timely manner, any contract award
1359 during competitive solicitation for contractual services and
1360 construction contracts that fail to include minority business
1361 enterprise participation, if any responsible and responsive
1362 vendor has demonstrated the ability to achieve any level of
1363 participation, or, any contract award for commodities where, a
1364 reasonable and economical opportunity to reserve a contract,
1365 statewide or district level, for minority participation was not
1366 executed or, an agency failed to adopt an applicable preference
1367 for minority participation. The bond requirement shall be waived
1368 for the office purposes of this subsection.
1369 (e) An agency may presume that a vendor offering no
1370 minority participation has not made a good faith effort when
1371 other vendors offer minority participation of firms listed as
1372 relevant to the agency's purchasing needs in the pertinent
1373 locality or statewide to complete the project.
1374 (f) Paragraph (a) will not apply when the Office of
1375 Supplier Diversity determines that an agency has established a
Page 55 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1376 work plan to allow advance consultation and planning with
1377 minority business enterprises and where such plan clearly
1378 demonstrates:
1379 1. A high level of advance planning by the agency with
1380 minority business enterprises.
1381 2. A high level of accessibility, knowledge, and
1382 experience by minority business enterprises in the agency's
1383 contract decisionmaking process.
1384 3. A high quality of agency monitoring and enforcement of
1385 internal implementation of minority business utilization
1386 provisions.
1387 4. A high quality of agency monitoring and enforcement of
1388 contractor utilization of minority business enterprises,
1389 especially tracking subcontractor data, and ensuring the
1390 integrity of subcontractor reporting.
1391 5. A high quality of agency outreach, agency networking of
1392 major vendors with minority vendors, and innovation in
1393 techniques to improve utilization of minority business
1394 enterprises.
1395 6. Substantial commitment, sensitivity, and proactive
1396 attitude by the agency head and among the agency minority
1397 business staff.
1398 (6) Each state agency shall coordinate its minority
1399 business enterprise procurement activities with the Office of
1400 Supplier Diversity. At a minimum, each agency shall:
Page 56 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1401 (a) Adopt a minority business enterprise utilization plan
1402 for review and approval by the Office of Supplier Diversity
1403 which should require meaningful and useful methods to attain the
1404 legislative intent in assisting minority business enterprises.
1405 (b) Designate a senior-level employee in the agency as a
1406 minority enterprise assistance officer, responsible for
1407 overseeing the agency's minority business utilization
1408 activities, and who is not also charged with purchasing
1409 responsibility. A senior-level agency employee and agency
1410 purchasing officials shall be accountable to the agency head for
1411 the agency's minority business utilization performance. The
1412 Office of Supplier Diversity shall advise each agency on
1413 compliance performance.
1414 (c) If an agency deviates significantly from its
1415 utilization plan in 2 consecutive or 3 out of 5 total fiscal
1416 years, the Office of Supplier Diversity may review any and all
1417 solicitations and contract awards of the agency as deemed
1418 necessary until such time as the agency meets its utilization
1419 plan.
1420 Section 26. Section 287.0947, Florida Statutes, is
1421 repealed.
1422 Section 27. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
1423 288.0001, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1424 288.0001 Economic Development Programs Evaluation.—The
1425 Office of Economic and Demographic Research and the Office of
Page 57 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1426 Program Policy Analysis and Government Accountability (OPPAGA)
1427 shall develop and present to the Governor, the President of the
1428 Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the
1429 chairs of the legislative appropriations committees the Economic
1430 Development Programs Evaluation.
1431 (2) The Office of Economic and Demographic Research and
1432 OPPAGA shall provide a detailed analysis of economic development
1433 programs as provided in the following schedule:
1434 (b) By January 1, 2015, and every 3 years thereafter, an
1435 analysis of:
1436 1. The entertainment industry sales tax exemption program
1437 established under s. 288.1258.
1438 2. VISIT Florida and its programs established or funded
1439 under ss. 288.122-288.12265 and 288.124.
1440 3. The Florida Sports Foundation and related programs,
1441 including those established under ss. 288.1162, 288.11621, and
1442 288.1166, and 288.1167.
1443 Section 28. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
1444 288.001, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1445 288.001 The Florida Small Business Development Center
1446 Network.—
1447 (4) STATEWIDE ADVISORY BOARD.—
1448 (b) The statewide advisory board shall consist of 19
1449 members from across the state. At least 12 members must be
1450 representatives of the private sector who are knowledgeable of
Page 58 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1451 the needs and challenges of small businesses. The members must
1452 represent various segments and industries of the economy in this
1453 state and must bring knowledge and skills to the statewide
1454 advisory board which would enhance the board's collective
1455 knowledge of small business assistance needs and challenges.
1456 Minority and gender representation must be considered when
1457 making appointments to the board. The board must include the
1458 following members:
1459 1. Three members appointed from the private sector by the
1460 President of the Senate.
1461 2. Three members appointed from the private sector by the
1462 Speaker of the House of Representatives.
1463 3. Three members appointed from the private sector by the
1464 Governor.
1465 4. Three members appointed from the private sector by the
1466 network's statewide director.
1467 5. One member appointed by the host institution.
1468 6. The Secretary of Commerce or his or her designee.
1469 7. The Chief Financial Officer or his or her designee.
1470 8. The President of the Florida Chamber of Commerce or his
1471 or her designee.
1472 9. The Small Business Development Center Project Officer
1473 from the U.S. Small Business Administration at the South Florida
1474 District Office or his or her designee.
1475 10. The executive director of the National Federation of
Page 59 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1476 Independent Businesses, Florida, or his or her designee.
1477 11. The executive director of the Florida United Business
1478 Association or his or her designee.
1479 Section 29. Subsection (8) of section 288.0065, Florida
1480 Statutes, is amended to read:
1481 288.0065 Annual incentives report.—By December 30 of each
1482 year, the department shall provide the Governor, the President
1483 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a
1484 detailed incentives report quantifying the economic benefits for
1485 all of the economic development incentive programs administered
1486 by the department and its public-private partnerships. The
1487 annual incentives report must include:
1488 (8) A description of the trends relating to business
1489 interest in, and usage of, the various incentives, and the
1490 number of small minority-owned or woman-owned businesses
1491 receiving incentives.
1492 Section 30. Section 288.1167, Florida Statutes, is
1493 repealed.
1494 Section 31. Subsection (1) of section 288.12266, Florida
1495 Statutes, is amended to read:
1496 288.12266 Targeted Marketing Assistance Program.—
1497 (1) The Targeted Marketing Assistance Program is created
1498 to enhance the tourism business marketing of small, minority,
1499 rural, and agritourism businesses in the state. The department,
1500 in conjunction with the Florida Tourism Industry Marketing
Page 60 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1501 Corporation, shall administer the program. The program shall
1502 provide marketing plans, marketing assistance, promotional
1503 support, media development, technical expertise, marketing
1504 advice, technology training, social marketing support, and other
1505 assistance to an eligible entity.
1506 Section 32. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
1507 288.1229, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1508 288.1229 Promotion and development of sports-related
1509 industries and amateur athletics; direct-support organization
1510 established; powers and duties.—
1511 (2) The Florida Sports Foundation must:
1512 (b) Be governed by a board of directors, which must
1513 consist of up to 15 members appointed by the Governor. In making
1514 appointments, the Governor must consider a potential member's
1515 background in community service and sports activism in, and
1516 financial support of, the sports industry, professional sports,
1517 or organized amateur athletics. Members must be residents of the
1518 state and highly knowledgeable about or active in professional
1519 or organized amateur sports.
1520 1. The board must contain representatives of all
1521 geographical regions of the state and must represent ethnic and
1522 gender diversity.
1523 2. The terms of office of the members shall be 4 years. No
1524 member may serve more than two consecutive terms. The Governor
1525 may remove any member for cause and shall fill all vacancies
Page 61 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1526 that occur.
1527 Section 33. Section 288.124, Florida Statutes, is amended
1528 to read:
1529 288.124 Convention grants program.—The Florida Tourism
1530 Industry Marketing Corporation is authorized to establish a
1531 convention grants program and, pursuant to that program, to
1532 recommend to the department expenditures and contracts with
1533 local governments and nonprofit corporations or organizations
1534 for the purpose of attracting national conferences and
1535 conventions to Florida. Preference shall be given to local
1536 governments and nonprofit corporations or organizations seeking
1537 to attract minority conventions to Florida. Minority conventions
1538 are events that primarily involve minority persons, as defined
1539 in s. 288.703, who are residents or nonresidents of the state.
1540 The Florida Tourism Industry Marketing Corporation shall
1541 establish guidelines governing the award of grants and the
1542 administration of this program. The department has final
1543 approval authority for any grants under this section. The total
1544 annual allocation of funds for this program shall not exceed
1545 $40,000.
1546 Section 34. Subsection (2) of section 288.7015, Florida
1547 Statutes, is amended to read:
1548 288.7015 Appointment of rules ombudsman; duties.—The
1549 Governor shall appoint a rules ombudsman, as defined in s.
1550 288.703, in the Executive Office of the Governor, for
Page 62 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1551 considering the impact of agency rules on the state's citizens
1552 and businesses. The duties of the rules ombudsman are to:
1553 (2) Review state agency rules that adversely or
1554 disproportionately impact businesses, particularly those
1555 relating to small and minority businesses.
1556 Section 35. Subsections (2), (5), and (6) of section
1557 288.703, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as (1), (2), and (3),
1558 respectively, and subsection (1) and present subsections (3),
1559 (4), and (5) of that section are amended, to read:
1560 288.703 Definitions.—As used in ss. 288.702-288.706, the
1561 term:
1562 (1) "Certified minority business enterprise" means a
1563 business which has been certified by the certifying organization
1564 or jurisdiction in accordance with s. 287.0943(1) and (2).
1565 (3) "Minority business enterprise" means any small
1566 business concern as defined in subsection (6) which is organized
1567 to engage in commercial transactions, which is domiciled in
1568 Florida, and which is at least 51-percent-owned by minority
1569 persons who are members of an insular group that is of a
1570 particular racial, ethnic, or gender makeup or national origin,
1571 which has been subjected historically to disparate treatment due
1572 to identification in and with that group resulting in an
1573 underrepresentation of commercial enterprises under the group's
1574 control, and whose management and daily operations are
1575 controlled by such persons. A minority business enterprise may
Page 63 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1576 primarily involve the practice of a profession. Ownership by a
1577 minority person does not include ownership which is the result
1578 of a transfer from a nonminority person to a minority person
1579 within a related immediate family group if the combined total
1580 net asset value of all members of such family group exceeds $1
1581 million. For purposes of this subsection, the term "related
1582 immediate family group" means one or more children under 16
1583 years of age and a parent of such children or the spouse of such
1584 parent residing in the same house or living unit.
1585 (4) "Minority person" means a lawful, permanent resident
1586 of Florida who is:
1587 (a) An African American, a person having origins in any of
1588 the black racial groups of the African Diaspora, regardless of
1589 cultural origin.
1590 (b) A Hispanic American, a person of Spanish or Portuguese
1591 culture with origins in Spain, Portugal, Mexico, South America,
1592 Central America, or the Caribbean, regardless of race.
1593 (c) An Asian American, a person having origins in any of
1594 the original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian
1595 Subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands, including the Hawaiian
1596 Islands before 1778.
1597 (d) A Native American, a person who has origins in any of
1598 the Indian Tribes of North America before 1835, upon
1599 presentation of proper documentation thereof as established by
1600 rule of the Department of Management Services.
Page 64 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1601 (e) An American woman.
1602 (2)(5) "Ombudsman" means an office or individual whose
1603 responsibilities include coordinating with the Office of
1604 Supplier Development Diversity for the interests of and
1605 providing assistance to small and minority business enterprises
1606 in dealing with governmental agencies and in developing
1607 proposals for changes in state agency rules.
1608 Section 36. Section 288.7031, Florida Statutes, is amended
1609 to read:
1610 288.7031 Application of definition certain definitions.—
1611 The definition definitions of "small business," "minority
1612 business enterprise," and "certified minority business
1613 enterprise" provided in s. 288.703 applies apply to the state
1614 and all political subdivisions of the state.
1615 Section 37. Subsection (2) of section 288.706, Florida
1616 Statutes, is amended to read:
1617 288.706 Florida Minority Business Loan Mobilization
1618 Program.—
1619 (2) The Florida Minority Business Loan Mobilization
1620 Program is created to promote the development of minority
1621 business enterprises, as defined in s. 288.703(3), increase the
1622 ability of minority business enterprises to compete for state
1623 contracts, and sustain the economic growth of minority business
1624 enterprises in this state. The goal of the program is to assist
1625 minority business enterprises by facilitating working capital
Page 65 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1626 loans to minority business enterprises that are vendors on state
1627 agency contracts. The Department of Management Services shall
1628 administer the program.
1629 Section 38. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
1630 288.776, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1631 288.776 Board of directors; powers and duties.—
1632 (1)(a) The corporation shall have a board of directors
1633 consisting of 15 members representing all geographic areas of
1634 the state. Minority and gender representation must be considered
1635 when making appointments to the board. The board membership must
1636 include:
1637 1. A representative of the following businesses, all of
1638 which must be registered to do business in this state: a foreign
1639 bank, a state bank, a federal bank, an insurance company
1640 involved in covering trade financing risks, and a small or
1641 medium-sized exporter.
1642 2. The following persons or their designees designee: the
1643 Secretary of Commerce, the Chief Financial Officer, the
1644 Secretary of State, and a senior official of the United States
1645 Department of Commerce.
1646 Section 39. Subsection (4) of section 290.004, Florida
1647 Statutes, is amended to read:
1648 290.004 Definitions relating to Florida Enterprise Zone
1649 Act.—As used in ss. 290.001-290.016:
1650 (4) "Minority business enterprise" has the same meaning as
Page 66 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1651 provided in s. 288.703.
1652 Section 40. Subsection (10) of section 290.0056, Florida
1653 Statutes, is amended to read:
1654 290.0056 Enterprise zone development agency.—
1655 (10) Contingent upon approval by the governing body, the
1656 agency may invest in community investment corporations which
1657 conduct, or agree to conduct, loan guarantee programs assisting
1658 small minority business enterprises located in the enterprise
1659 zone. In making such investments, the agency shall first attempt
1660 to invest in existing community investment corporations
1661 providing services in the enterprise zone. Such investments
1662 shall be made under conditions required by law and as the agency
1663 may require, including, but not limited to:
1664 (a) The funds invested by the agency shall be used to
1665 provide loan guarantees to individuals for small minority
1666 business enterprises located in the enterprise zone.
1667 (b) The community investment corporation may not approve
1668 any application for a loan guarantee unless the person applying
1669 for the loan guarantee shows that he or she has applied for the
1670 loan or loan guarantee through normal banking channels and that
1671 the loan or loan guarantee has been refused by at least one bank
1672 or other financial institution.
1673 Section 41. Paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of section
1674 290.0057, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1675 290.0057 Enterprise zone development plan.—
Page 67 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1676 (1) Any application for designation as a new enterprise
1677 zone must be accompanied by a strategic plan adopted by the
1678 governing body of the municipality or county, or the governing
1679 bodies of the county and one or more municipalities together. At
1680 a minimum, the plan must:
1681 (f) Identify the amount of local and private resources
1682 that will be available in the nominated area and the
1683 private/public partnerships to be used, which may include
1684 participation by, and cooperation with, universities, community
1685 colleges, small business development centers, black business
1686 investment corporations, certified development corporations, and
1687 other private and public entities.
1688 Section 42. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
1689 290.046, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1690 290.046 Applications for grants; procedures;
1691 requirements.—
1692 (3)
1693 (c) The application's program impact score, equal
1694 employment opportunity and fair housing score, and communitywide
1695 needs score may take into consideration scoring factors,
1696 including, but not limited to, unemployment, poverty levels,
1697 low-income and moderate-income populations, benefits to low-
1698 income and moderate-income residents, use of minority-owned and
1699 woman-owned business enterprises in previous grants, health and
1700 safety issues, and the condition of physical structures.
Page 68 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1701 Section 43. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
1702 295.187, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1703 295.187 Florida Veteran Business Enterprise Opportunity
1704 Act.—
1705 (4) VENDOR PREFERENCE.—
1706 (b) Notwithstanding s. 287.057(12), If a veteran business
1707 enterprise entitled to the vendor preference under this section
1708 and one or more businesses entitled to this preference or
1709 another vendor preference provided by law submit bids,
1710 proposals, or replies for procurement of commodities or
1711 contractual services which are equal with respect to all
1712 relevant considerations, including price, quality, and service,
1713 the state agency shall award the procurement or contract to the
1714 business having the smallest net worth.
1715 Section 44. Subsection (3) of section 320.63, Florida
1716 Statutes, is amended to read:
1717 320.63 Application for license; contents.—Any person
1718 desiring to be licensed pursuant to ss. 320.60-320.70 shall make
1719 application therefor to the department upon a form containing
1720 such information as the department requires. The department
1721 shall require, with such application or otherwise and from time
1722 to time, all of the following, which information may be
1723 considered by the department in determining the fitness of the
1724 applicant or licensee to engage in the business for which the
1725 applicant or licensee desires to be licensed:
Page 69 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1726 (3) From each manufacturer, distributor, or importer which
1727 utilizes an identical blanket basic agreement for its dealers or
1728 distributors in this state, which agreement comprises all or any
1729 part of the applicant's or licensee's agreements with motor
1730 vehicle dealers in this state, a copy of the written agreement
1731 and all supplements thereto, together with a list of the
1732 applicant's or licensee's authorized dealers or distributors and
1733 their addresses. The applicant or licensee shall further notify
1734 the department immediately of the appointment of any additional
1735 dealer or distributor. The applicant or licensee shall annually
1736 report to the department on its efforts to add new minority
1737 dealer points, including difficulties encountered under ss.
1738 320.61-320.70. For purposes of this section "minority" shall
1739 have the same meaning as that given it in the definition of
1740 "minority person" in s. 288.703. Not later than 60 days before
1741 the date a revision or modification to a franchise agreement is
1742 offered uniformly to a licensee's motor vehicle dealers in this
1743 state, the licensee shall notify the department of such
1744 revision, modification, or addition to the franchise agreement
1745 on file with the department. In no event may a franchise
1746 agreement, or any addendum or supplement thereto, be offered to
1747 a motor vehicle dealer in this state until the applicant or
1748 licensee files an affidavit with the department acknowledging
1749 that the terms or provisions of the agreement, or any related
1750 document, are not inconsistent with, prohibited by, or contrary
Page 70 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1751 to the provisions contained in ss. 320.60-320.70. Any franchise
1752 agreement offered to a motor vehicle dealer in this state shall
1753 provide that all terms and conditions in such agreement
1754 inconsistent with the law and rules of this state are of no
1755 force and effect.
1756 Section 45. Paragraph (d) of subsection (4) of section
1757 337.11, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1758 337.11 Contracting authority of department; bids;
1759 emergency repairs, supplemental agreements, and change orders;
1760 combined design and construction contracts; progress payments;
1761 records; requirements of vehicle registration.—
1762 (4)
1763 (d) Notwithstanding the requirements of ss. 120.57(3)(c)
1764 and 287.057(23) 287.057(25), upon receipt of a formal written
1765 protest that is timely filed, the department may continue the
1766 process provided in this subsection but may not take final
1767 agency action as to the lowest bidder except as part of the
1768 department's final agency action in the protest or upon
1769 dismissal of the protest by the protesting party.
1770 Section 46. Paragraph (b) of subsection (5) of section
1771 339.63, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1772 339.63 System facilities designated; additions and
1773 deletions.—
1774 (5)
1775 (b) A facility designated part of the Strategic Intermodal
Page 71 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1776 System pursuant to paragraph (a) that is within the jurisdiction
1777 of a local government that maintains a transportation
1778 concurrency system shall receive a waiver of transportation
1779 concurrency requirements applicable to Strategic Intermodal
1780 System facilities in order to accommodate any development at the
1781 facility which occurs pursuant to a building permit issued on or
1782 before December 31, 2017, but only if such facility is located:
1783 1. Within an area designated pursuant to s. 288.0656(7) as
1784 a rural area of opportunity;
1785 2. Within a rural enterprise zone as defined in s. 290.004
1786 s. 290.004(5); or
1787 3. Within 15 miles of the boundary of a rural area of
1788 opportunity or a rural enterprise zone.
1789 Section 47. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
1790 376.3072, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1791 376.3072 Florida Petroleum Liability and Restoration
1792 Insurance Program.—
1793 (2)(a) An owner or operator of a petroleum storage system
1794 may become an insured in the restoration insurance program at a
1795 facility if:
1796 1. A site at which an incident has occurred is eligible
1797 for restoration if the insured is a participant in the third-
1798 party liability insurance program or otherwise meets applicable
1799 financial responsibility requirements. After July 1, 1993, the
1800 insured must also provide the required excess insurance coverage
Page 72 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1801 or self-insurance for restoration to achieve the financial
1802 responsibility requirements of 40 C.F.R. s. 280.97, subpart H,
1803 not covered by paragraph (d).
1804 2. A site which had a discharge reported before January 1,
1805 1989, for which notice was given pursuant to s. 376.3071(10) and
1806 which is ineligible for the third-party liability insurance
1807 program solely due to that discharge is eligible for
1808 participation in the restoration program for an incident
1809 occurring on or after January 1, 1989, pursuant to subsection
1810 (3). Restoration funding for an eligible contaminated site will
1811 be provided without participation in the third-party liability
1812 insurance program until the site is restored as required by the
1813 department or until the department determines that the site does
1814 not require restoration.
1815 3. Notwithstanding paragraph (b), a site where an
1816 application is filed with the department before January 1, 1995,
1817 where the owner is a small business under s. 288.703(3) s.
1818 288.703(6), a Florida College System institution with less than
1819 2,500 FTE, a religious institution as defined by s.
1820 212.08(7)(m), a charitable institution as defined by s.
1821 212.08(7)(p), or a county or municipality with a population of
1822 less than 50,000, is eligible for up to $400,000 of eligible
1823 restoration costs, less a deductible of $10,000 for small
1824 businesses, eligible Florida College System institutions, and
1825 religious or charitable institutions, and $30,000 for eligible
Page 73 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1826 counties and municipalities, if:
1827 a. Except as provided in sub-subparagraph e., the facility
1828 was in compliance with department rules at the time of the
1829 discharge.
1830 b. The owner or operator has, upon discovery of a
1831 discharge, promptly reported the discharge to the department,
1832 and drained and removed the system from service, if necessary.
1833 c. The owner or operator has not intentionally caused or
1834 concealed a discharge or disabled leak detection equipment.
1835 d. The owner or operator proceeds to complete initial
1836 remedial action as specified in department rules.
1837 e. The owner or operator, if required and if it has not
1838 already done so, applies for third-party liability coverage for
1839 the facility within 30 days after receipt of an eligibility
1840 order issued by the department pursuant to this subparagraph.
1841
1842 However, the department may consider in-kind services from
1843 eligible counties and municipalities in lieu of the $30,000
1844 deductible. The cost of conducting initial remedial action as
1845 defined by department rules is an eligible restoration cost
1846 pursuant to this subparagraph.
1847 4.a. By January 1, 1997, facilities at sites with existing
1848 contamination must have methods of release detection to be
1849 eligible for restoration insurance coverage for new discharges
1850 subject to department rules for secondary containment. Annual
Page 74 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1851 storage system testing, in conjunction with inventory control,
1852 shall be considered to be a method of release detection until
1853 the later of December 22, 1998, or 10 years after the date of
1854 installation or the last upgrade. Other methods of release
1855 detection for storage tanks which meet such requirement are:
1856 (I) Interstitial monitoring of tank and integral piping
1857 secondary containment systems;
1858 (II) Automatic tank gauging systems; or
1859 (III) A statistical inventory reconciliation system with a
1860 tank test every 3 years.
1861 b. For pressurized integral piping systems, the owner or
1862 operator must use:
1863 (I) An automatic in-line leak detector with flow
1864 restriction meeting the requirements of department rules used in
1865 conjunction with an annual tightness or pressure test; or
1866 (II) An automatic in-line leak detector with electronic
1867 flow shut-off meeting the requirements of department rules.
1868 c. For suction integral piping systems, the owner or
1869 operator must use:
1870 (I) A single check valve installed directly below the
1871 suction pump if there are no other valves between the dispenser
1872 and the tank; or
1873 (II) An annual tightness test or other approved test.
1874 d. Owners of facilities with existing contamination that
1875 install internal release detection systems pursuant to sub-
Page 75 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1876 subparagraph a. shall permanently close their external
1877 groundwater and vapor monitoring wells pursuant to department
1878 rules by December 31, 1998. Upon installation of the internal
1879 release detection system, such wells must be secured and taken
1880 out of service until permanent closure.
1881 e. Facilities with vapor levels of contamination meeting
1882 the requirements of or below the concentrations specified in the
1883 performance standards for release detection methods specified in
1884 department rules may continue to use vapor monitoring wells for
1885 release detection.
1886 f. The department may approve other methods of release
1887 detection for storage tanks and integral piping which have at
1888 least the same capability to detect a new release as the methods
1889 specified in this subparagraph.
1890
1891 Sites meeting the criteria of this subsection for which a site
1892 rehabilitation completion order was issued before June 1, 2008,
1893 do not qualify for the 2008 increase in site rehabilitation
1894 funding assistance and are bound by the pre-June 1, 2008,
1895 limits. Sites meeting the criteria of this subsection for which
1896 a site rehabilitation completion order was not issued before
1897 June 1, 2008, regardless of whether they have previously
1898 transitioned to nonstate-funded cleanup status, may continue
1899 state-funded cleanup pursuant to s. 376.3071(6) until a site
1900 rehabilitation completion order is issued or the increased site
Page 76 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1901 rehabilitation funding assistance limit is reached, whichever
1902 occurs first.
1903 Section 48. Paragraph (g) of subsection (1) of section
1904 376.84, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1905 376.84 Brownfield redevelopment economic incentives.—It is
1906 the intent of the Legislature that brownfield redevelopment
1907 activities be viewed as opportunities to significantly improve
1908 the utilization, general condition, and appearance of these
1909 sites. Different standards than those in place for new
1910 development, as allowed under current state and local laws,
1911 should be used to the fullest extent to encourage the
1912 redevelopment of a brownfield. State and local governments are
1913 encouraged to offer redevelopment incentives for this purpose,
1914 as an ongoing public investment in infrastructure and services,
1915 to help eliminate the public health and environmental hazards,
1916 and to promote the creation of jobs in these areas. Such
1917 incentives may include financial, regulatory, and technical
1918 assistance to persons and businesses involved in the
1919 redevelopment of the brownfield pursuant to this act.
1920 (1) Financial incentives and local incentives for
1921 redevelopment may include, but not be limited to:
1922 (g) Minority business enterprise programs as provided in
1923 s. 287.0943.
1924 Section 49. Paragraph (b) of subsection (8) of section
1925 381.986, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 77 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1926 381.986 Medical use of marijuana.—
1927 (8) MEDICAL MARIJUANA TREATMENT CENTERS.—
1928 (b) An applicant for licensure as a medical marijuana
1929 treatment center must apply to the department on a form
1930 prescribed by the department and adopted in rule. The department
1931 shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54
1932 establishing a procedure for the issuance and biennial renewal
1933 of licenses, including initial application and biennial renewal
1934 fees sufficient to cover the costs of implementing and
1935 administering this section, and establishing supplemental
1936 licensure fees for payment beginning May 1, 2018, sufficient to
1937 cover the costs of administering ss. 381.989 and 1004.4351. The
1938 department shall identify applicants with strong diversity plans
1939 reflecting this state's commitment to diversity and implement
1940 training programs and other educational programs to enable
1941 minority persons and minority business enterprises, as defined
1942 in s. 288.703, and veteran business enterprises, as defined in
1943 s. 295.187, to compete for medical marijuana treatment center
1944 licensure and contracts. Subject to the requirements in
1945 subparagraphs (a)2.-4., the department shall issue a license to
1946 an applicant if the applicant meets the requirements of this
1947 section and pays the initial application fee. The department
1948 shall renew the licensure of a medical marijuana treatment
1949 center biennially if the licensee meets the requirements of this
1950 section and pays the biennial renewal fee. However, the
Page 78 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1951 department may not renew the license of a medical marijuana
1952 treatment center that has not begun to cultivate, process, and
1953 dispense marijuana by the date that the medical marijuana
1954 treatment center is required to renew its license. An individual
1955 may not be an applicant, owner, officer, board member, or
1956 manager on more than one application for licensure as a medical
1957 marijuana treatment center. An individual or entity may not be
1958 awarded more than one license as a medical marijuana treatment
1959 center. An applicant for licensure as a medical marijuana
1960 treatment center must demonstrate:
1961 1. That, for the 5 consecutive years before submitting the
1962 application, the applicant has been registered to do business in
1963 this state.
1964 2. Possession of a valid certificate of registration
1965 issued by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services
1966 pursuant to s. 581.131.
1967 3. The technical and technological ability to cultivate
1968 and produce marijuana, including, but not limited to, low-THC
1969 cannabis.
1970 4. The ability to secure the premises, resources, and
1971 personnel necessary to operate as a medical marijuana treatment
1972 center.
1973 5. The ability to maintain accountability of all raw
1974 materials, finished products, and any byproducts to prevent
1975 diversion or unlawful access to or possession of these
Page 79 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
1976 substances.
1977 6. An infrastructure reasonably located to dispense
1978 marijuana to registered qualified patients statewide or
1979 regionally as determined by the department.
1980 7. The financial ability to maintain operations for the
1981 duration of the 2-year approval cycle, including the provision
1982 of certified financial statements to the department.
1983 a. Upon approval, the applicant must post a $5 million
1984 performance bond issued by an authorized surety insurance
1985 company rated in one of the three highest rating categories by a
1986 nationally recognized rating service. However, a medical
1987 marijuana treatment center serving at least 1,000 qualified
1988 patients is only required to maintain a $2 million performance
1989 bond.
1990 b. In lieu of the performance bond required under sub-
1991 subparagraph a., the applicant may provide an irrevocable letter
1992 of credit payable to the department or provide cash to the
1993 department. If provided with cash under this sub-subparagraph,
1994 the department must deposit the cash in the Grants and Donations
1995 Trust Fund within the Department of Health, subject to the same
1996 conditions as the bond regarding requirements for the applicant
1997 to forfeit ownership of the funds. If the funds deposited under
1998 this sub-subparagraph generate interest, the amount of that
1999 interest must be used by the department for the administration
2000 of this section.
Page 80 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2001 8. That all owners and managers have passed a background
2002 screening pursuant to subsection (9). As used in this
2003 subparagraph, the term:
2004 a. "Manager" means any person with the authority to
2005 exercise or contribute to the operational control, direction, or
2006 management of an applicant or a medical marijuana treatment
2007 center or who has authority to supervise any employee of an
2008 applicant or a medical marijuana treatment center. The term
2009 includes an individual with the power or authority to direct or
2010 influence the direction or operation of an applicant or a
2011 medical marijuana treatment center through board membership, an
2012 agreement, or a contract.
2013 b. "Owner" means any person who owns or controls a 5
2014 percent or greater share of interests of the applicant or a
2015 medical marijuana treatment center which include beneficial or
2016 voting rights to interests. In the event that one person owns a
2017 beneficial right to interests and another person holds the
2018 voting rights with respect to such interests, then in such case,
2019 both are considered the owner of such interests.
2020 9. The employment of a medical director to supervise the
2021 activities of the medical marijuana treatment center.
2022 10. A diversity plan that promotes and ensures the
2023 involvement of minority persons and minority business
2024 enterprises, as defined in s. 288.703, or veteran business
2025 enterprises, as defined in s. 295.187, in ownership, management,
Page 81 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2026 and employment. An applicant for licensure renewal must show the
2027 effectiveness of the diversity plan by including the following
2028 with his or her application for renewal:
2029 a. Representation of minority persons and veterans in the
2030 medical marijuana treatment center's workforce;
2031 b. Efforts to recruit minority persons and veterans for
2032 employment; and
2033 c. A record of contracts for services with minority
2034 business enterprises and veteran business enterprises.
2035 Section 50. Subsection (5) of section 383.216, Florida
2036 Statutes, is amended to read:
2037 383.216 Community-based prenatal and infant health care.—
2038 (5) The membership of each prenatal and infant health care
2039 coalition shall represent health care providers, the recipient
2040 community, and the community at large; shall represent the
2041 racial, ethnic, and gender composition of the community; and
2042 shall include at least the following:
2043 (a) Consumers of family planning, primary care, or
2044 prenatal care services, at least two of whom are low-income or
2045 Medicaid eligible.
2046 (b) Health care providers, including:
2047 1. County health departments.
2048 2. Migrant and community health centers.
2049 3. Hospitals.
2050 4. Local medical societies.
Page 82 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2051 5. Local health planning organizations.
2052 (c) Local health advocacy interest groups and community
2053 organizations.
2054 (d) County and municipal governments.
2055 (e) Social service organizations.
2056 (f) Local education communities.
2057 Section 51. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
2058 394.47865, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2059 394.47865 South Florida State Hospital; privatization.—
2060 (1) The Department of Children and Families shall, through
2061 a request for proposals, privatize South Florida State Hospital.
2062 The department shall plan to begin implementation of this
2063 privatization initiative by July 1, 1998.
2064 (a) Notwithstanding s. 287.057(12) s. 287.057(14), the
2065 department may enter into agreements, not to exceed 20 years,
2066 with a private provider, a coalition of providers, or another
2067 agency to finance, design, and construct a treatment facility
2068 having up to 350 beds and to operate all aspects of daily
2069 operations within the facility. The department may subcontract
2070 any or all components of this procurement to a statutorily
2071 established state governmental entity that has successfully
2072 contracted with private companies for designing, financing,
2073 acquiring, leasing, constructing, and operating major privatized
2074 state facilities.
2075 Section 52. Section 395.807, Florida Statutes, is
Page 83 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2076 repealed.
2077 Section 53. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) and subsection
2078 (3) of section 402.7305, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2079 402.7305 Department of Children and Families; procurement
2080 of contractual services; contract management.—
2081 (2) PROCUREMENT OF COMMODITIES AND CONTRACTUAL SERVICES.—
2082 (b) When it is in the best interest of a defined segment
2083 of its consumer population, the department may competitively
2084 procure and contract for systems of treatment or service that
2085 involve multiple providers, rather than procuring and
2086 contracting for treatment or services separately from each
2087 participating provider. The department must ensure that all
2088 providers that participate in the treatment or service system
2089 meet all applicable statutory, regulatory, service quality, and
2090 cost control requirements. If other governmental entities or
2091 units of special purpose government contribute matching funds to
2092 the support of a given system of treatment or service, the
2093 department shall formally request information from those funding
2094 entities in the procurement process and may take the information
2095 received into account in the selection process. If a local
2096 government contributes matching funds to support the system of
2097 treatment or contracted service and if the match constitutes at
2098 least 25 percent of the value of the contract, the department
2099 shall afford the governmental match contributor an opportunity
2100 to name an employee as one of the persons required by s.
Page 84 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2101 287.057(15) s. 287.057(17) to evaluate or negotiate certain
2102 contracts, unless the department sets forth in writing the
2103 reason why the inclusion would be contrary to the best interest
2104 of the state. Any employee so named by the governmental match
2105 contributor shall qualify as one of the persons required by s.
2106 287.057(15) s. 287.057(17). A governmental entity or unit of
2107 special purpose government may not name an employee as one of
2108 the persons required by s. 287.057(15) s. 287.057(17) if it, or
2109 any of its political subdivisions, executive agencies, or
2110 special districts, intends to compete for the contract to be
2111 awarded. The governmental funding entity or contributor of
2112 matching funds must comply with all procurement procedures set
2113 forth in s. 287.057 when appropriate and required.
2114 (3) CONTRACT MANAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS AND PROCESS.—The
2115 Department of Children and Families shall review the time period
2116 for which the department executes contracts and shall execute
2117 multiyear contracts to make the most efficient use of the
2118 resources devoted to contract processing and execution. Whenever
2119 the department chooses not to use a multiyear contract, a
2120 justification for that decision must be contained in the
2121 contract. Notwithstanding s. 287.057(13) s. 287.057(15), the
2122 department is responsible for establishing a contract management
2123 process that requires a member of the department's Senior
2124 Management or Selected Exempt Service to assign in writing the
2125 responsibility of a contract to a contract manager. The
Page 85 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2126 department shall maintain a set of procedures describing its
2127 contract management process which must minimally include the
2128 following requirements:
2129 (a) The contract manager shall maintain the official
2130 contract file throughout the duration of the contract and for a
2131 period not less than 6 years after the termination of the
2132 contract.
2133 (b) The contract manager shall review all invoices for
2134 compliance with the criteria and payment schedule provided for
2135 in the contract and shall approve payment of all invoices before
2136 their transmission to the Department of Financial Services for
2137 payment.
2138 (c) The contract manager shall maintain a schedule of
2139 payments and total amounts disbursed and shall periodically
2140 reconcile the records with the state's official accounting
2141 records.
2142 (d) For contracts involving the provision of direct client
2143 services, the contract manager shall periodically visit the
2144 physical location where the services are delivered and speak
2145 directly to clients receiving the services and the staff
2146 responsible for delivering the services.
2147 (e) The contract manager shall meet at least once a month
2148 directly with the contractor's representative and maintain
2149 records of such meetings.
2150 (f) The contract manager shall periodically document any
Page 86 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2151 differences between the required performance measures and the
2152 actual performance measures. If a contractor fails to meet and
2153 comply with the performance measures established in the
2154 contract, the department may allow a reasonable period for the
2155 contractor to correct performance deficiencies. If performance
2156 deficiencies are not resolved to the satisfaction of the
2157 department within the prescribed time, and if no extenuating
2158 circumstances can be documented by the contractor to the
2159 department's satisfaction, the department must terminate the
2160 contract. The department may not enter into a new contract with
2161 that same contractor for the services for which the contract was
2162 previously terminated for a period of at least 24 months after
2163 the date of termination. The contract manager shall obtain and
2164 enforce corrective action plans, if appropriate, and maintain
2165 records regarding the completion or failure to complete
2166 corrective action items.
2167 (g) The contract manager shall document any contract
2168 modifications, which shall include recording any contract
2169 amendments as provided for in this section.
2170 (h) The contract manager shall be properly trained before
2171 being assigned responsibility for any contract.
2172 Section 54. Subsection (2) of section 408.045, Florida
2173 Statutes, is amended to read:
2174 408.045 Certificate of need; competitive sealed
2175 proposals.—
Page 87 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2176 (2) The agency shall make a decision regarding the
2177 issuance of the certificate of need in accordance with the
2178 provisions of s. 287.057(15) s. 287.057(17), rules adopted by
2179 the agency relating to intermediate care facilities for the
2180 developmentally disabled, and the criteria in s. 408.035, as
2181 further defined by rule.
2182 Section 55. Subsection (24) of section 409.901, Florida
2183 Statutes, is amended to read:
2184 409.901 Definitions; ss. 409.901-409.920.—As used in ss.
2185 409.901-409.920, except as otherwise specifically provided, the
2186 term:
2187 (24) "Minority physician network" means a network of
2188 primary care physicians with experience managing Medicaid or
2189 Medicare recipients that is predominantly owned by minorities as
2190 defined in s. 288.703, which may have a collaborative
2191 partnership with a public college or university and a tax-exempt
2192 charitable corporation.
2193 Section 56. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of section
2194 409.920, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2195 409.920 Medicaid provider fraud.—
2196 (1) For the purposes of this section, the term:
2197 (e) "Managed care plans" means a health insurer authorized
2198 under chapter 624, an exclusive provider organization authorized
2199 under chapter 627, a health maintenance organization authorized
2200 under chapter 641, a prepaid health plan authorized under this
Page 88 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2201 chapter, a provider service network authorized under this
2202 chapter, a minority physician network authorized under this
2203 chapter, and an emergency department diversion program
2204 authorized under this chapter or the General Appropriations Act,
2205 providing health care services pursuant to a contract with the
2206 Medicaid program.
2207 Section 57. Section 420.622, Florida Statutes, is
2208 repealed.
2209 Section 58. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
2210 430.502, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2211 430.502 Alzheimer's disease; memory disorder clinics and
2212 day care and respite care programs.—
2213 (4) The department shall develop performance goals that
2214 exceed the minimum performance standards developed under
2215 subsection (3), which goals must be achieved in order for a
2216 memory disorder clinic to be eligible for incentive funding
2217 above the base level, subject to legislative appropriation.
2218 Incentive funding shall be based on criteria including, but not
2219 limited to:
2220 (b) Significant increase in public outreach to low-income
2221 and minority populations.
2222 Section 59. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
2223 440.45, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2224 440.45 Office of the Judges of Compensation Claims.—
2225 (2)
Page 89 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2226 (b) Except as provided in paragraph (c), the Governor
2227 shall appoint a judge of compensation claims from a list of
2228 three persons nominated by a statewide nominating commission.
2229 The statewide nominating commission shall be composed of the
2230 following:
2231 1. Six members, at least one of whom must be a member of a
2232 minority group as defined in s. 288.703, one of each who resides
2233 in each of the territorial jurisdictions of the district courts
2234 of appeal, appointed by the Board of Governors of The Florida
2235 Bar from among The Florida Bar members engaged in the practice
2236 of law. Each member shall be appointed for a 4-year term;
2237 2. Six electors, at least one of whom must be a member of
2238 a minority group as defined in s. 288.703, one of each who
2239 resides in each of the territorial jurisdictions of the district
2240 courts of appeal, appointed by the Governor. Each member shall
2241 be appointed for a 4-year term; and
2242 3. Six electors, at least one of whom must be a member of
2243 a minority group as defined in s. 288.703, one of each who
2244 resides in the territorial jurisdictions of the district courts
2245 of appeal, selected and appointed by a majority vote of the
2246 other 10 members of the commission. Each member shall be
2247 appointed for a 4-year term.
2248
2249 A vacancy occurring on the commission shall be filled by the
2250 original appointing authority for the unexpired balance of the
Page 90 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2251 term. An attorney who appears before any judge of compensation
2252 claims more than four times a year is not eligible to serve on
2253 the statewide nominating commission. The meetings and
2254 determinations of the nominating commission as to the judges of
2255 compensation claims shall be open to the public.
2256 Section 60. Subsections (9) through (15) of section
2257 445.007, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (8)
2258 through (14), respectively, and subsections (1) and (8) of that
2259 section are amended, to read:
2260 445.007 Local workforce development boards.—
2261 (1) One local workforce development board shall be
2262 appointed in each designated service delivery area and shall
2263 serve as the local workforce development board pursuant to Pub.
2264 L. No. 113-128. The membership of the local board must be
2265 consistent with Pub. L. No. 113-128, Title I, s. 107(b). If a
2266 public education or training provider is represented on the
2267 local board, a representative of a private education provider
2268 must also be appointed to the local board. The state board may
2269 waive this requirement if requested by a local board if it is
2270 demonstrated that such representatives do not exist in the
2271 region. The importance of minority and gender representation
2272 shall be considered when making appointments to the local board.
2273 The local board, its committees, subcommittees, and
2274 subdivisions, and other units of the workforce system, including
2275 units that may consist in whole or in part of local governmental
Page 91 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2276 units, may use any method of telecommunications to conduct
2277 meetings, including establishing a quorum through
2278 telecommunications, provided that the public is given proper
2279 notice of the telecommunications meeting and reasonable access
2280 to observe and, when appropriate, participate. Local boards are
2281 subject to chapters 119 and 286 and s. 24, Art. I of the State
2282 Constitution. Each member of a local board who is not otherwise
2283 required to file a full and public disclosure of financial
2284 interests under s. 8, Art. II of the State Constitution or s.
2285 112.3144 shall file a statement of financial interests under s.
2286 112.3145. The executive director or designated person
2287 responsible for the operational and administrative functions of
2288 the local board who is not otherwise required to file a full and
2289 public disclosure of financial interests under s. 8, Art. II of
2290 the State Constitution or s. 112.3144 shall file a statement of
2291 financial interests under s. 112.3145. The local board's
2292 website, or the department's website if the local board does not
2293 maintain a website, must inform the public that each disclosure
2294 or statement has been filed with the Commission on Ethics and
2295 provide information how each disclosure or statement may be
2296 reviewed. The notice to the public must remain on the website
2297 throughout the term of office or employment of the filer and
2298 until 1 year after the term on the local board or employment
2299 ends.
2300 (8) The importance of minority and gender representation
Page 92 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2301 shall be considered when appointments are made to any committee
2302 established by the local workforce development board.
2303 Section 61. Subsection (12) of section 446.041, Florida
2304 Statutes, is amended to read:
2305 446.041 Duties of the department.—The department shall:
2306 (12) Ensure that minority and gender diversity are
2307 considered in administering this program.
2308 Section 62. Section 473.3065, Florida Statutes, is amended
2309 to read:
2310 473.3065 Clay Ford Scholarship Program; Certified Public
2311 Accountant Education Opportunity Minority Assistance Advisory
2312 Council.—
2313 (1) The Clay Ford Scholarship Program for Florida
2314 residents is hereby established in the division for the purpose
2315 of providing scholarships to minority persons as defined in s.
2316 288.703 who are students enrolled in their fifth year of an
2317 accounting education program at an institution in this state
2318 approved by the board by rule. A Certified Public Accountant
2319 Education Opportunity Minority Assistance Advisory Council shall
2320 assist the board in administering the program.
2321 (2) All moneys used to provide scholarships under the Clay
2322 Ford Scholarship Program shall be funded by a portion of
2323 existing license fees, as set by the board, not to exceed $10
2324 per license. Such moneys shall be deposited into the
2325 Professional Regulation Trust Fund in a separate account
Page 93 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2326 maintained for that purpose. The department may spend up to
2327 $200,000 per year for the program from this program account but
2328 may not allocate overhead charges to it. Moneys for scholarships
2329 shall be disbursed twice per year upon recommendation of the
2330 advisory council and approval by the board, based on the adopted
2331 eligibility criteria and comparative evaluation of all
2332 applicants. Funds in the program account may be invested by the
2333 Chief Financial Officer under the same limitations as apply to
2334 investment of other state funds, and all interest earned thereon
2335 shall be credited to the program account.
2336 (3) The board shall adopt rules as necessary for
2337 administration of the Clay Ford Scholarship Program, including
2338 rules relating to the following:
2339 (a) Eligibility criteria for receipt of a scholarship,
2340 which, at a minimum, shall include the following factors:
2341 1. Financial need.
2342 2. Ethnic, gender, or racial minority status pursuant to
2343 s. 288.703(4).
2344 2.3. Scholastic ability and performance.
2345 (b) Scholarship application procedures.
2346 (c) Amounts in which scholarships may be provided, the
2347 total amount that may be provided, the timeframe for payments or
2348 partial payments, and criteria for how scholarship funds may be
2349 expended.
2350 (d) The total amount of scholarships that can be made each
Page 94 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2351 year.
2352 (e) The minimum balance that must be maintained in the
2353 program account.
2354 (4) Determinations made by the board regarding recipients
2355 of scholarship moneys shall not be considered agency action for
2356 purposes of chapter 120.
2357 (5) It is unlawful for any person or agent of such person
2358 to knowingly file with the board any notice, statement, or other
2359 document that is false or that contains any material
2360 misstatement of fact. A person who violates this subsection
2361 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as
2362 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
2363 (6) There is hereby created the Certified Public
2364 Accountant Education Opportunity Minority Assistance Advisory
2365 Council to assist the board in administering the Clay Ford
2366 Scholarship Program. The council shall be diverse and
2367 representative of the gender, ethnic, and racial categories set
2368 forth in s. 288.703(4).
2369 (a) The council shall consist of five licensed Florida-
2370 certified public accountants selected by the board, of whom one
2371 shall be a board member who serves as chair of the council, one
2372 shall be a representative of the National Association of Black
2373 Accountants, one shall be a representative of the Cuban American
2374 CPA Association, and two shall be selected at large. At least
2375 one member of the council must be a woman.
Page 95 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2376 (b) The board shall determine the terms for initial
2377 appointments and appointments thereafter.
2378 (c) Any vacancy on the council shall be filled in the
2379 manner provided for the selection of the initial member. Any
2380 member appointed to fill a vacancy of an unexpired term shall be
2381 appointed for the remainder of that term.
2382 (d) Three consecutive absences or absences constituting 50
2383 percent or more of the council's meetings within any 12-month
2384 period shall cause the council membership of the member in
2385 question to become void, and the position shall be considered
2386 vacant.
2387 (e) The members of the council shall serve without
2388 compensation, and any necessary and actual expenses incurred by
2389 a member while engaged in the business of the council shall be
2390 borne by such member or by the organization or agency such
2391 member represents. However, the council member who is a member
2392 of the board shall be compensated in accordance with ss.
2393 455.207(4) and 112.061.
2394 Section 63. Subsection (4) of section 489.111, Florida
2395 Statutes, is amended to read:
2396 489.111 Licensure by examination.—
2397 (4) The department shall ensure that a sensitivity review
2398 committee has been established including representatives of
2399 various ethnic/minority groups. No question found by this
2400 committee to be discriminatory against any ethnic/minority group
Page 96 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2401 shall be included in the examination.
2402 Section 64. Subsection (42) of section 570.07, Florida
2403 Statutes, is amended to read:
2404 570.07 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services;
2405 functions, powers, and duties.—The department shall have and
2406 exercise the following functions, powers, and duties:
2407 (42) Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 287.057(22) s.
2408 287.057(24) that require all agencies to use the online
2409 procurement system developed by the Department of Management
2410 Services, the department may continue to use its own online
2411 system. However, vendors utilizing such system shall be
2412 prequalified as meeting mandatory requirements and
2413 qualifications and shall remit fees pursuant to s. 287.057(22)
2414 s. 287.057(24), and any rules implementing s. 287.057.
2415 Section 65. Subsection (2) of section 616.255, Florida
2416 Statutes, is amended to read:
2417 616.255 Duties of authority; Florida State Fairgrounds.—
2418 The authority shall:
2419 (2) Throughout each year, promote the progress of the
2420 state and stimulate public interest in the advantages and
2421 development of the state by providing facilities for
2422 agricultural and industrial exhibitions, public gatherings,
2423 cultural activities, and other functions intended to advance the
2424 educational, physical, economic, and cultural interests of the
2425 public. It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority,
Page 97 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2426 when contracting for concessions at functions held pursuant to
2427 this subsection, give consideration to increasing the number of
2428 concessionaires that are small minority businesses.
2429 Section 66. Subsection (2) of section 616.256, Florida
2430 Statutes, is amended to read:
2431 616.256 Powers of authority.—
2432 (2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the
2433 authority, when contracting for the acquisition of personal
2434 property or services pursuant to this section, give
2435 consideration to increasing the number of contractors that are
2436 small minority businesses.
2437 Section 67. Paragraph (e) of subsection (6) of section
2438 627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2439 627.351 Insurance risk apportionment plans.—
2440 (6) CITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.—
2441 (e) The corporation is subject to s. 287.057 for the
2442 purchase of commodities and contractual services except as
2443 otherwise provided in this paragraph. Services provided by
2444 tradepersons or technical experts to assist a licensed adjuster
2445 in the evaluation of individual claims are not subject to the
2446 procurement requirements of this section. Additionally, the
2447 procurement of financial services providers and underwriters
2448 must be made pursuant to s. 627.3513. Contracts for goods or
2449 services valued at or more than $100,000 are subject to approval
2450 by the board.
Page 98 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2451 1. The corporation is an agency for purposes of s.
2452 287.057, except that, for purposes of s. 287.057(22) s.
2453 287.057(24), the corporation is an eligible user.
2454 a. The authority of the Department of Management Services
2455 and the Chief Financial Officer under s. 287.057 extends to the
2456 corporation as if the corporation were an agency.
2457 b. The executive director of the corporation is the agency
2458 head under s. 287.057. The executive director of the corporation
2459 may assign or appoint a designee to act on his or her behalf.
2460 2. The corporation must provide notice of a decision or
2461 intended decision concerning a solicitation, contract award, or
2462 exceptional purchase by electronic posting. Such notice must
2463 contain the following statement: "Failure to file a protest
2464 within the time prescribed in this section constitutes a waiver
2465 of proceedings."
2466 a. A person adversely affected by the corporation's
2467 decision or intended decision to award a contract pursuant to s.
2468 287.057(1) or (3)(c) who elects to challenge the decision must
2469 file a written notice of protest with the executive director of
2470 the corporation within 72 hours after the corporation posts a
2471 notice of its decision or intended decision. For a protest of
2472 the terms, conditions, and specifications contained in a
2473 solicitation, including provisions governing the methods for
2474 ranking bids, proposals, replies, awarding contracts, reserving
2475 rights of further negotiation, or modifying or amending any
Page 99 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2476 contract, the notice of protest must be filed in writing within
2477 72 hours after posting the solicitation. Saturdays, Sundays, and
2478 state holidays are excluded in the computation of the 72-hour
2479 time period.
2480 b. A formal written protest must be filed within 10 days
2481 after the date the notice of protest is filed. The formal
2482 written protest must state with particularity the facts and law
2483 upon which the protest is based. Upon receipt of a formal
2484 written protest that has been timely filed, the corporation must
2485 stop the solicitation or contract award process until the
2486 subject of the protest is resolved by final board action unless
2487 the executive director sets forth in writing particular facts
2488 and circumstances that require the continuance of the
2489 solicitation or contract award process without delay in order to
2490 avoid an immediate and serious danger to the public health,
2491 safety, or welfare.
2492 (I) The corporation must provide an opportunity to resolve
2493 the protest by mutual agreement between the parties within 7
2494 business days after receipt of the formal written protest.
2495 (II) If the subject of a protest is not resolved by mutual
2496 agreement within 7 business days, the corporation's board must
2497 transmit the protest to the Division of Administrative Hearings
2498 and contract with the division to conduct a hearing to determine
2499 the merits of the protest and to issue a recommended order. The
2500 contract must provide for the corporation to reimburse the
Page 100 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2501 division for any costs incurred by the division for court
2502 reporters, transcript preparation, travel, facility rental, and
2503 other customary hearing costs in the manner set forth in s.
2504 120.65(9). The division has jurisdiction to determine the facts
2505 and law concerning the protest and to issue a recommended order.
2506 The division's rules and procedures apply to these proceedings.
2507 The protest must be heard by the division at a publicly noticed
2508 meeting in accordance with procedures established by the
2509 division.
2510 c. In a protest of an invitation-to-bid or request-for-
2511 proposals procurement, submissions made after the bid or
2512 proposal opening which amend or supplement the bid or proposal
2513 may not be considered. In protesting an invitation-to-negotiate
2514 procurement, submissions made after the corporation announces
2515 its intent to award a contract, reject all replies, or withdraw
2516 the solicitation that amends or supplements the reply may not be
2517 considered. Unless otherwise provided by law, the burden of
2518 proof rests with the party protesting the corporation's action.
2519 In a competitive-procurement protest, other than a rejection of
2520 all bids, proposals, or replies, the administrative law judge
2521 must conduct a de novo proceeding to determine whether the
2522 corporation's proposed action is contrary to the corporation's
2523 governing statutes, the corporation's rules or policies, or the
2524 solicitation specifications. The standard of proof for the
2525 proceeding is whether the corporation's action was clearly
Page 101 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2526 erroneous, contrary to competition, arbitrary, or capricious. In
2527 any bid-protest proceeding contesting an intended corporation
2528 action to reject all bids, proposals, or replies, the standard
2529 of review by the board is whether the corporation's intended
2530 action is illegal, arbitrary, dishonest, or fraudulent.
2531 d. Failure to file a notice of protest or failure to file
2532 a formal written protest constitutes a waiver of proceedings.
2533 3. The agency head or his or her designee shall consider
2534 the recommended order of an administrative law judge and take
2535 final action on the protest. Any further legal remedy lies with
2536 the First District Court of Appeal.
2537 Section 68. Subsection (7) of section 627.3511, Florida
2538 Statutes, is amended to read:
2539 627.3511 Depopulation of Citizens Property Insurance
2540 Corporation.—
2541 (7) A minority business, which is at least 51 percent
2542 owned by minority persons as described in s. 288.703, desiring
2543 to operate or become licensed as a property and casualty insurer
2544 may exempt up to $50 of the escrow requirements of the take-out
2545 bonus, as described in this section. Such minority business,
2546 which has applied for a certificate of authority to engage in
2547 business as a property and casualty insurer, may simultaneously
2548 file the business' proposed take-out plan, as described in this
2549 section, with the corporation.
2550 Section 69. Section 641.217, Florida Statutes, is
Page 102 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2551 repealed.
2552 Section 70. Part IV of chapter 760, Florida Statutes,
2553 consisting of section 760.80, Florida Statutes, is repealed, and
2554 part V of that chapter is redesignated as part IV of that
2555 chapter.
2556 Section 71. Paragraph (k) of subsection (1) of section
2557 1001.216, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2558 1001.216 Council on the Social Status of Black Men and
2559 Boys.—
2560 (1) The Council on the Social Status of Black Men and Boys
2561 is established within Florida Memorial University and shall be
2562 composed of 19 members appointed as follows:
2563 (k) A businessperson who is an African American, as
2564 defined in s. 760.80(2)(a), appointed by the Governor.
2565 Section 72. Paragraph (d) of subsection (7) of section
2566 1001.706, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2567 1001.706 Powers and duties of the Board of Governors.—
2568 (7) POWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO PROPERTY.—
2569 (d) The Board of Governors, or the board's designee, shall
2570 ensure compliance with the provisions of s. 287.09451 for all
2571 procurement and ss. 255.101 and 255.102 for construction
2572 contracts, and rules adopted pursuant thereto, relating to the
2573 utilization of minority business enterprises, except that
2574 procurements costing less than the amount provided for in
2575 CATEGORY FIVE as provided in s. 287.017 shall not be subject to
Page 103 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2576 s. 287.09451.
2577 Section 73. Subsections (1) and (10) of section 1004.42,
2578 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2579 1004.42 Florida State University College of Medicine.—
2580 (1) CREATION.—There is hereby established a 4-year
2581 allopathic medical school within the Florida State University,
2582 to be known as the Florida State University College of Medicine,
2583 with a principal focus on recruiting and training medical
2584 professionals to meet the primary health care needs of the
2585 state, especially the needs of the state's elderly, rural,
2586 minority, and other underserved citizens.
2587 (10) INCREASING PARTICIPATION OF UNDERREPRESENTED GROUPS.—
2588 To increase the participation of underrepresented groups and
2589 socially and economically disadvantaged youth in science and
2590 medical programs, the College of Medicine shall continue the
2591 outreach efforts of the Program in Medical Sciences (PIMS) to
2592 middle and high school minority students, including the Science
2593 Students Together Reaching Instructional Diversity and
2594 Excellence (SSTRIDE), and shall build an endowment income to
2595 support recruitment programs and scholarship and financial aid
2596 packages for these students. To develop a base of qualified
2597 potential medical school candidates from underrepresented
2598 groups, the College of Medicine shall coordinate with the
2599 undergraduate premedical and science programs currently offered
2600 at the Florida State University, develop relationships with
Page 104 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2601 potential feeder institutions, including 4-year institutions and
2602 community colleges, and pursue grant funds to support programs,
2603 as well as support scholarship and financial aid packages. The
2604 College of Medicine shall develop plans for a postbaccalaureate,
2605 1-year academic program that provides a second chance to a
2606 limited number of students per year who have been declined
2607 medical school admission, who are state residents, and who meet
2608 established criteria as socially and economically disadvantaged.
2609 The College of Medicine shall make every effort, through
2610 recruitment and retention, to employ a faculty and support staff
2611 that reflect the heterogeneous nature of the state's general
2612 population.
2613 Section 74. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
2614 1004.435, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2615 1004.435 Cancer control and research.—
2616 (4) FLORIDA CANCER CONTROL AND RESEARCH ADVISORY COUNCIL;
2617 CREATION; COMPOSITION.—
2618 (a) There is created within the H. Lee Moffitt Cancer
2619 Center and Research Institute, Inc., the Florida Cancer Control
2620 and Research Advisory Council. The council shall consist of 16
2621 members, which includes the chairperson, all of whom must be
2622 residents of this state. The State Surgeon General or his or her
2623 designee within the Department of Health shall be one of the 16
2624 members. Members, except those appointed by the Governor, the
2625 Speaker of the House of Representatives, or the President of the
Page 105 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2626 Senate, must be appointed by the chief executive officer of the
2627 institution or organization represented, or his or her designee.
2628 One member must be a representative of the American Cancer
2629 Society; one member must be a representative of the Sylvester
2630 Comprehensive Cancer Center of the University of Miami; one
2631 member must be a representative of the University of Florida
2632 Shands Cancer Center; one member must be a representative of the
2633 Florida Nurses Association who specializes in the field of
2634 oncology and is not from an institution or organization already
2635 represented on the council; one member must be a representative
2636 of the Florida Osteopathic Medical Association who specializes
2637 in the field of oncology; one member must be a member of the
2638 Florida Medical Association who specializes in the field of
2639 oncology and who represents a cancer center not already
2640 represented on the council; one member must be a representative
2641 of the H. Lee Moffitt Cancer Center and Research Institute,
2642 Inc.; one member must be a representative of the Mayo Clinic in
2643 Jacksonville; one member must be a member of the Florida
2644 Hospital Association who specializes in the field of oncology
2645 and who represents a comprehensive cancer center not already
2646 represented on the council; one member must be a representative
2647 of the Association of Community Cancer Centers; one member must
2648 specialize in pediatric oncology research or clinical care
2649 appointed by the Governor; one member must specialize in
2650 oncology clinical care or research appointed by the President of
Page 106 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1189 2026
2651 the Senate; one member must be a current or former cancer
2652 patient or a current or former caregiver to a cancer patient
2653 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; one
2654 member must be a member of the House of Representatives
2655 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and
2656 one member must be a member of the Senate appointed by the
2657 President of the Senate. At least four of the members must be
2658 individuals who are minority persons as defined by s. 288.703.
2659 Section 75. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
2660 1013.46, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2661 1013.46 Advertising and awarding contracts;
2662 prequalification of contractor.—
2663 (1)
2664 (c) As an option, any county, municipality, or board may
2665 set aside up to 10 percent of the total amount of funds
2666 allocated for the purpose of entering into construction capital
2667 project contracts with minority business enterprises, as defined
2668 in s. 287.094. Such contracts shall be competitively bid only
2669 among minority business enterprises. The set-aside shall be used
2670 to redress present effects of past discriminatory practices and
2671 shall be subject to periodic reassessment to account for
2672 changing needs and circumstances.
2673 Section 76. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 107 of 107
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1189-00